Florida, session 2026, SB1452.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 351 352 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 17.11, Florida 353 Statutes, is amended to read: 354 17.11âTo report disbursements made.â 355 (2)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall also cause to have 356 reported from the Financial Management Florida Accounting 357 Information Resource Subsystem no less than quarterly the 358 disbursements which agencies made to small businesses, as 359 defined in the Florida Small and Minority Business Assistance 360 Act; to certified minority business enterprises in the 361 aggregate; and to certified minority business enterprises broken 362 down into categories of minority persons, as well as gender and 363 nationality subgroups. This information shall be made available 364 to the agencies, the Office of Supplier Diversity, the Governor, 365 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 366 Representatives. Each agency shall be responsible for the 367 accuracy of information entered into the Financial Management 368 Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem for use in 369 this reporting. 370 Section 2.âSection 17.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to 371 read: 372 17.13âTo replace duplicate warrants lost or destroyed.â 373 (1)âThe Chief Financial Officer is required to replace 374 duplicate any Chief Financial Officerâs warrants that may have 375 been lost or destroyed, or may hereafter be lost or destroyed, 376 upon the owner thereof or the ownerâs agent or attorney 377 presenting the Chief Financial Officer the statement, under 378 oath, reciting the number, date, and amount of any warrant or 379 the best and most definite description in his or her knowledge 380 and the circumstances of its loss; if the Chief Financial 381 Officer deems it necessary, the owner or the ownerâs agent or 382 attorney shall file in the office of the Chief Financial Officer 383 a surety bond, or a bond with securities, to be approved by one 384 of the judges of the circuit court or one of the justices of the 385 Supreme Court, in a penalty of not less than twice the amount of 386 any warrants so replaced duplicated, conditioned to indemnify 387 the state and any innocent holders thereof from any damages that 388 may accrue from such replacement duplication. 389 (2)âThe Chief Financial Officer is required to replace 390 duplicate any Chief Financial Officerâs warrant that may have 391 been lost or destroyed, or may hereafter be lost or destroyed, 392 when sent to any payee via any state agency when such warrant is 393 lost or destroyed prior to being received by the payee and 394 provided the director of the state agency to whom the warrant 395 was sent presents to the Chief Financial Officer a statement, 396 under oath, reciting the number, date, and amount of the warrant 397 lost or destroyed, the circumstances surrounding the loss or 398 destruction of such warrant, and any additional information that 399 the Chief Financial Officer shall request in regard to such 400 warrant. 401 (3)âAny replacement duplicate Chief Financial Officerâs 402 warrant issued in pursuance of the above provisions shall be of 403 the same validity as the original was before its loss. 404 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 110.113, Florida 405 Statutes, is amended to read: 406 110.113âPay periods for state officers and employees; 407 salary payments by direct deposit.â 408 (1)âThe normal pay period for salaries of state officers 409 and employees shall be 1 month. The Department of Financial 410 Services shall issue either monthly or biweekly salary payments 411 by state warrants or by direct deposit pursuant to s. 17.076 or 412 make semimonthly salary payments by direct deposit pursuant to 413 s. 17.076, as requested by the head of each state agency and 414 approved by the Executive Office of the Governor and the 415 Department of Financial Services. 416 Section 4.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (2) of 417 section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, to read: 418 112.3135âRestriction on employment of relatives.â 419 (2) 420 (c)âTo aid the recruitment of firefighters within this 421 state, notwithstanding paragraph (a), a public official may 422 appoint, employ, promote, or advance, or advocate for the 423 appointment, employment, promotion, or advancement of, a 424 relative as a firefighter as defined in s. 633.102 if such 425 appointment, employment, promotion, or advancement is part of a 426 competitive process provided for in a collective bargaining 427 agreement. 428 Section 5.âPresent subsections (4) through (10) of section 429 215.5586, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5) 430 through (11), respectively, a new subsection (4) is added to 431 that section, and paragraphs (a) through (e) of subsection (1), 432 subsections (2) and (3), paragraph (a) of present subsection 433 (8), and present subsection (10) of that section are amended, to 434 read: 435 215.5586âMy Safe Florida Home Program.âThere is established 436 within the Department of Financial Services the My Safe Florida 437 Home Program. The department shall provide fiscal 438 accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership 439 for the program, consistent with this section. This section does 440 not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the 441 state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of 442 residential property in this state. Implementation of this 443 program is subject to annual legislative appropriations. It is 444 the intent of the Legislature that, subject to the availability 445 of funds, the My Safe Florida Home Program provide licensed 446 inspectors to perform hurricane mitigation inspections of 447 eligible homes and grants to fund hurricane mitigation projects 448 on those homes. The department shall implement the program in 449 such a manner that the total amount of funding requested by 450 accepted applications, whether for inspections, grants, or other 451 services or assistance, does not exceed the total amount of 452 available funds. If, after applications are processed and 453 approved, funds remain available, the department may accept 454 applications up to the available amount. The program shall 455 develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach 456 for hurricane damage mitigation pursuant to the requirements 457 provided in this section. 458 (1)âHURRICANE MITIGATION INSPECTIONS.â 459 (a)1.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term: 460 a.ââAttachedâ means a dwelling unit that shares a wall with 461 another dwelling unit. 462 b.ââDetachedâ means a dwelling that does not share a wall 463 with another dwelling unit or building and has greater than zero 464 clearance between it and any other building. This term includes 465 a garage located under a contiguous roof with a residence. 466 c.ââSingle-familyâ means a residence designed for and 467 containing only one dwelling unit. 468 2.âAn applicant is To be eligible for a hurricane 469 mitigation inspection under the program if all of the following 470 conditions are met: 471 a.1.âThe A home for which the inspection is sought is must 472 be a single-family, unit on an individual parcel of land which 473 is: 474 (I)âA detached residential property; or 475 (II)âAn attached residential property not exceeding three 476 stories. A townhouse as defined in s. 481.203; 477 b.2.âThe A home for which the inspection is sought is must 478 be site-built and owner-occupied.; and 479 c.3.âThe applicant is homeowner must have been granted a 480 homestead exemption on the home under chapter 196. 481 (b)1.âAn application for a hurricane mitigation inspection 482 must contain a signed or electronically verified statement made 483 under penalty of perjury that the applicant has submitted only 484 one inspection application on the home or that the application 485 is allowed under subparagraph 2., and the application must have 486 documents attached which demonstrate that the applicant meets 487 the requirements of paragraph (a). 488 2.âAn applicant may submit a subsequent hurricane 489 mitigation inspection application for the same home only if: 490 a.âThe original hurricane mitigation inspection application 491 has been denied or withdrawn because of material errors or 492 omissions in the application; 493 b.âThe original hurricane mitigation inspection application 494 was denied or withdrawn because the applicant home did not meet 495 the eligibility criteria for an inspection at the time of the 496 previous application, and the applicant homeowner reasonably 497 believes that he or she is the home now is eligible for an 498 inspection; or 499 c.âThe programâs eligibility requirements for an inspection 500 have changed since the original application date, and the 501 applicant reasonably believes that he or she the home is 502 eligible under the new requirements; or 503 d.âMore than 24 months have passed since the applicant 504 received a hurricane mitigation inspection under this section, 505 and the applicant has not received a grant payment through the 506 program for that inspection. 507 (c)âAn applicant meeting the requirements of paragraph (a) 508 may receive an inspection of the a home through under the 509 program without being eligible for a grant under subsection (2) 510 or applying for such grant. 511 (d)âLicensed inspectors are to provide initial home 512 inspections of eligible homes to determine what mitigation 513 measures are needed, what insurance premium discounts may be 514 available, and what improvements to existing residential 515 properties are needed to reduce the propertiesâ propertyâs 516 vulnerability to hurricane damage. An inspector may inspect a 517 townhouse as defined in s. 481.203 to determine if opening 518 protection mitigation as listed in subparagraph (2)(e)1. would 519 provide improvements to mitigate hurricane damage. 520 (e)âThe department shall contract with wind certification 521 entities to provide hurricane mitigation inspections. The 522 initial inspections provided to applicants homeowners, at a 523 minimum, must include: 524 1.âA home inspection and report that summarizes the 525 inspection results and identifies recommended improvements an 526 applicant a homeowner may make take to mitigate hurricane 527 damage. 528 2.âA range of cost estimates regarding the recommended 529 mitigation improvements. 530 3.âInformation regarding estimated premium discounts, 531 correlated to the current mitigation features and the 532 recommended mitigation improvements identified by the 533 inspection. 534 (2)âHURRICANE MITIGATION GRANTS.âFinancial grants shall be 535 used by applicants homeowners to make improvements recommended 536 by an initial inspection which increase a homeâs resistance to 537 hurricane damage. 538 (a)âAn applicant A homeowner is eligible for a hurricane 539 mitigation grant if all of the following criteria are met: 540 1.âThe applicant home must be eligible for an inspection 541 under subsection (1). 542 2.âThe home must be a dwelling with an insured value of 543 $700,000 or less. Homeowners who are low-income persons, as 544 defined in s. 420.0004(11), are exempt from this requirement. 545 3.âThe home must undergo an initial acceptable hurricane 546 mitigation inspection through the program as provided in 547 subsection (1) within the 24 months immediately preceding the 548 date of application. 549 4.âThe building permit application for initial construction 550 of the home must have been built made before January 1, 2008, as 551 reflected on the county property appraiserâs website. 552 5.âThe applicant homeowner must agree to make his or her 553 home available for a final inspection once a mitigation project 554 is completed. 555 6.âThe applicant homeowner must agree to provide to the 556 department information received from the applicantâs homeownerâs 557 insurer identifying the discounts realized by the applicant 558 homeowner because of the mitigation improvements funded through 559 the program. 560 7.a.âThe applicant homeowner must be a low-income person or 561 moderate-income person as defined in s. 420.0004. 562 b.âThe hurricane mitigation inspection must have occurred 563 within the previous 24 months from the date of application. 564 c.âNotwithstanding subparagraph 2., homeowners who are low 565 income persons, as defined in s. 420.0004(11), are not exempt 566 from the requirement that the home must be a dwelling with an 567 insured value of $700,000 or less. 568 d.âThis subparagraph expires July 1, 2026. 569 (b)1.âAn application for a grant must contain a signed or 570 electronically verified statement made under penalty of perjury 571 that the applicant has submitted only one grant application or 572 that the application is allowed under subparagraph 2., and the 573 application must have documents attached demonstrating that the 574 applicant meets the requirements of paragraph (a). 575 2.âAn applicant may submit a subsequent grant application 576 if: 577 a.âThe original grant application was denied or withdrawn 578 because the application contained errors or omissions; 579 b.âThe original grant application was denied or withdrawn 580 because the applicant home did not meet the eligibility criteria 581 for a grant at the time of the previous application, and the 582 applicant homeowner reasonably believes that he or she is the 583 home now is eligible for a grant; or 584 c.âThe programâs eligibility requirements for a grant have 585 changed since the original application date, and the applicant 586 reasonably believes that he or she is an eligible homeowner 587 under the new requirements. 588 3.âA grant application must include a statement from the 589 applicant homeowner which contains the name and state license 590 number of the contractor that the applicant homeowner 591 acknowledges as the intended contractor for the mitigation work. 592 The program must electronically verify that the contractorâs 593 state license number is valid accurate and up to date before 594 grant approval. 595 (c)âAll grants must be matched on the basis of $1 provided 596 by the applicant for $2 provided by the state up to a maximum 597 state contribution of $10,000 toward the actual cost of the 598 mitigation project, except as provided in paragraph (h). 599 (d)âAll hurricane mitigation performed under the program 600 must be based upon the securing of all required local permits 601 and inspections and must be performed by properly licensed 602 contractors. 603 (e)âWhen recommended by an initial a hurricane mitigation 604 inspection, grants for eligible applicants homes may be used for 605 all of the following improvements: 606 1.âOpening protection improvements, including: 607 a.âExterior doors., 608 b.âGarage doors., 609 c.âWindows., and 610 d.âSkylights. 611 2.âRoof improvements, including: 612 a.âReinforcing roof-to-wall connections. 613 b.3.âImproving the strength of roof-deck attachments. 614 c.4.âInstalling secondary water resistance for roof and 615 replacing the roof covering. 616 (f)âImprovements must be identified by the final hurricane 617 mitigation inspection to receive grant funds When recommended by 618 a hurricane mitigation inspection, grants for townhouses, as 619 defined in s. 481.203, may only be used for opening protection. 620 (g)âThe department may require that improvements be made to 621 all openings, including exterior doors, garage doors, windows, 622 and skylights, as a condition of reimbursing an applicant a 623 homeowner approved for a grant. The department may adopt, by 624 rule, the maximum grant allowances for any improvement allowable 625 under paragraph (e) or paragraph (f). 626 (h)âLow-income applicants homeowners, as defined in s. 627 420.0004(11), who otherwise meet the applicable requirements of 628 this subsection are eligible for a grant of up to $10,000 and 629 are not required to provide a matching amount to receive the 630 grant. 631 (i)1.âThe department shall develop a process that ensures 632 the most efficient means to collect and verify inspection 633 applications and grant applications to determine eligibility. 634 The department may direct hurricane mitigation inspectors to 635 collect and verify grant application information or use the 636 Internet or other electronic means to collect information and 637 determine eligibility. 638 2.âThe department shall prioritize the review and approval 639 of such inspection applications and grant applications in the 640 following order: 641 a.âFirst, applications from low-income persons, as defined 642 in s. 420.0004, who are at least 60 years old; 643 b.âSecond, applications from all other low-income persons, 644 as defined in s. 420.0004; 645 c.âThird, applications from moderate-income persons, as 646 defined in s. 420.0004, who are at least 60 years old; and 647 d.âFourth, applications from all other moderate-income 648 persons, as defined in s. 420.0004; and 649 e.âLast, all other applications for an inspection. 650 3.âThe department shall start accepting inspection 651 applications and grant applications no earlier than the 652 effective date of a legislative appropriation funding 653 inspections and grants, as follows: 654 a.âInitially, from applicants prioritized under sub 655 subparagraph 2.a.; 656 b.âFrom applicants prioritized under sub-subparagraph 2.b., 657 beginning 15 days after the program initially starts accepting 658 applications; 659 c.âFrom applicants prioritized under sub-subparagraph 2.c., 660 beginning 30 days after the program initially starts accepting 661 applications; 662 d.âFrom applicants described in sub-subparagraph 2.d., 663 beginning 45 days after the program initially starts accepting 664 applications; and 665 e.âFrom all other applicants for an inspection, beginning 666 60 days after the program initially starts accepting 667 applications. 668 4.âThe program may accept a certification directly from a 669 low-income applicant homeowner or moderate-income applicant 670 homeowner who meets the requirements of s. 420.0004(11) or (12), 671 respectively, if the applicant homeowner provides such 672 certification in a signed or electronically verified statement 673 made under penalty of perjury. 674 5.âThe program may accept a certification directly from an 675 applicant attesting to his or her age if the applicant provides 676 such certification in a signed or electronically verified 677 statement made under penalty of perjury. 678 (j)âAn applicant A homeowner who receives a grant shall 679 finalize construction and request a final inspection, or request 680 an extension for an additional 6 months, within 18 months 1 year 681 after grant application approval. If an applicant a homeowner 682 fails to comply with this paragraph, his or her application is 683 deemed abandoned and the grant money reverts to the department. 684 (3)âREQUESTS FOR INFORMATION.âThe department may request 685 that an applicant provide additional information. An application 686 is deemed abandoned withdrawn by the applicant if the department 687 does not receive a response to its request for additional 688 information within 60 days after the notification of any 689 apparent error or omission. 690 (4)âABANDONED APPLICATIONS.âThe department shall notify an 691 applicant at least 5 business days before an application is 692 deemed abandoned. If the applicant responds to such notification 693 within 5 business days after receiving the notice and 694 demonstrates good cause for why the application should not be 695 deemed abandoned, the applicant may submit a subsequent grant 696 application or the department may determine the application is 697 not abandoned. 698 (9)(8)âCONTRACT MANAGEMENT.â 699 (a)âThe department may contract with third parties for 700 grants management, inspection services, contractor services for 701 low-income applicants homeowners, information technology, 702 educational outreach, and auditing services. Such contracts are 703 considered direct costs of the program and are not subject to 704 administrative cost limits. The department shall contract with 705 providers that have a demonstrated record of successful business 706 operations in areas directly related to the services to be 707 provided and shall ensure the highest accountability for use of 708 state funds, consistent with this section. 709 (11)(10)âREPORTS.âThe department shall make an annual 710 report on the activities of the program that shall account for 711 the use of state funds and indicate the number of inspections 712 requested, the number of inspections performed, the number of 713 grant applications received, the number and value of grants 714 approved, and the estimated average annual amount of insurance 715 premium discounts and total estimated annual amount of insurance 716 premium discounts applicants homeowners received from insurers 717 as a result of mitigation funded through the program. The report 718 must be delivered to the President of the Senate and the Speaker 719 of the House of Representatives by February 1 of each year. 720 Section 6.âSubsection (3) of section 215.89, Florida 721 Statutes, is amended to read: 722 215.89âCharts of account.â 723 (3)âREPORTING STRUCTURE.â 724 (a)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall accept comments from 725 state agencies, local governments, educational entities, 726 entities of higher education, and other interested parties 727 regarding the proposed charts of account until November 1, 2013. 728 (b)âBy January 15, 2014, the Chief Financial Officer, after 729 consultation with affected state agencies, local governments, 730 educational entities, entities of higher education, and the 731 Auditor General, shall submit to the Governor, the President of 732 the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a 733 report recommending a uniform charts of account which requires 734 specific enterprise-wide information related to revenues and 735 expenditures of state agencies, local governments, educational 736 entities, and entities of higher education. The report must 737 include the estimated cost of adopting and implementing a 738 uniform enterprise-wide charts of account. 739 Section 7.âSubsection (1) of section 215.93, Florida 740 Statutes, is amended to read: 741 215.93âFlorida Financial Management Information System.â 742 (1)âTo provide the information necessary to carry out the 743 intent of the Legislature, there shall be a Florida Financial 744 Management Information System. The Florida Financial Management 745 Information System shall be fully implemented and shall be 746 upgraded as necessary to ensure the efficient operation of an 747 integrated financial management information system and to 748 provide necessary information for the effective operation of 749 state government. Upon the recommendation of the coordinating 750 council and approval of the board, the Florida Financial 751 Management Information System may require data from any state 752 agency information system or information subsystem or may 753 request data from any judicial branch information system or 754 information subsystem that the coordinating council and board 755 have determined to have statewide financial management 756 significance. Each functional owner information subsystem within 757 the Florida Financial Management Information System shall be 758 developed in such a fashion as to allow for timely, positive, 759 preplanned, and prescribed data transfers between the Florida 760 Financial Management Information System functional owner 761 information subsystems and from other information systems. The 762 principal unit of the system shall be the functional owner 763 information subsystem, and the system shall include, but shall 764 not be limited to, the following: 765 (a)âPlanning and Budgeting Subsystem. 766 (b)âFlorida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem. 767 (b)(c)âFinancial Management Subsystem. 768 (c)(d)âPurchasing Subsystem. 769 (d)(e)âPersonnel Information System. 770 Section 8.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 215.94, 771 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 772 215.94âDesignation, duties, and responsibilities of 773 functional owners.â 774 (2)âThe Department of Financial Services shall be the 775 functional owner of the Financial Management Florida Accounting 776 Information Resource Subsystem established pursuant to ss. 777 17.03, 215.86, 216.141, and 216.151 and further developed in 778 accordance with the provisions of ss. 215.90-215.96. The 779 subsystem shall include, but shall not be limited to, the 780 following functions: 781 (a)âAccounting and reporting so as to provide timely data 782 for producing financial statements for the state in accordance 783 with generally accepted accounting principles. 784 (b)âAuditing and settling claims against the state. 785 (3)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall be the functional 786 owner of the Financial Management Subsystem. The Chief Financial 787 Officer shall design, implement, and operate the subsystem in 788 accordance with the provisions of ss. 215.90-215.96. The 789 subsystem shall include, but shall not be limited to, functions 790 for: 791 (c)(a)âRecording and reconciling credits and debits to 792 treasury fund accounts. 793 (d)(b)âMonitoring cash levels and activities in state bank 794 accounts. 795 (e)(c)âMonitoring short-term investments of idle cash. 796 (f)(d)âAdministering the provisions of the Federal Cash 797 Management Improvement Act of 1990. 798 Section 9.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 215.96, 799 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 800 215.96âCoordinating council and design and coordination 801 staff.â 802 (2)âThe coordinating council shall consist of the Chief 803 Financial Officer; the Commissioner of Agriculture; the Attorney 804 General; the Secretary of Management Services; the state chief 805 information officer; the executive director of the Department of 806 Revenue; and the Director of Planning and Budgeting, Executive 807 Office of the Governor, or their designees. The Chief Financial 808 Officer, or his or her designee, shall be chair of the council, 809 and the design and coordination staff shall provide 810 administrative and clerical support to the council and the 811 board. The design and coordination staff shall maintain the 812 Minutes of each meeting must be made and make such minutes 813 available to any interested person. The Auditor General, the 814 State Courts Administrator, a an executive officer of the 815 Florida Association of state agency administrative services 816 director selected by the council Directors, and a an executive 817 officer of the Florida Association of state budget officer 818 selected by the council Officers, or their designees, shall 819 serve without voting rights as ex officio members of the 820 council. The chair may call meetings of the council as often as 821 necessary to transact business; however, the council shall meet 822 at least once a year. Action of the council shall be by motion, 823 duly made, seconded and passed by a majority of the council 824 voting in the affirmative for approval of items that are to be 825 recommended for approval to the Financial Management Information 826 Board. 827 (3)âThe coordinating council, assisted by the design and 828 coordination staff, shall have the following duties, powers, and 829 responsibilities pertaining to the Florida Financial Management 830 Information System: 831 (a)âTo review and coordinate annual workplans to ensure 832 that the Florida Financial Management Information System remains 833 aligned across participating entities. The coordination council 834 shall ensure that each participating entity submits an annual 835 workplan by October 1 of each year. The coordinating council 836 shall review and discuss the workplans, identify potential 837 impacts or conflicts, facilitate resolutions when practicable, 838 and expedite unresolved issues as appropriate. 839 (b)âTo conduct such studies and to establish committees, 840 workgroups, and teams to develop recommendations for rules, 841 policies, procedures, principles, and standards to the board as 842 necessary to assist the board in its efforts to design, 843 implement, and perpetuate a financial management information 844 system, including, but not limited to, the establishment of 845 common data codes, and the development of integrated financial 846 management policies that address the information and management 847 needs of the functional owner subsystems. The coordinating 848 council shall make available a copy of the approved plan in 849 writing or through electronic means to each of the coordinating 850 council members, the fiscal committees of the Legislature, and 851 any interested person. 852 (c)(b)âTo recommend to the board solutions, policy 853 alternatives, and legislative budget request issues that will 854 provide ensure a framework for the timely, positive, preplanned, 855 and prescribed data transfer between information subsystems and 856 to recommend to the board solutions, policy alternatives, and 857 legislative budget request issues that ensure the availability 858 of data and information that support state planning, policy 859 development, management, evaluation, and performance monitoring. 860 (c)âTo report to the board all actions taken by the 861 coordinating council for final action. 862 (d)âTo review the annual work plans of the functional owner 863 information subsystems by October 1 of each year. The review 864 shall be conducted to assess the status of the Florida Financial 865 Management Information System and the functional owner 866 subsystems in regard to the provisions of s. 215.91. The 867 coordinating council, as part of the review process, may make 868 recommendations for modifications to the functional owner 869 information subsystems annual work plans. 870 Section 10.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 871 215.985, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 872 215.985âTransparency in government spending.â 873 (4)âThe Executive Office of the Governor, in consultation 874 with the appropriations committees of the Senate and the House 875 of Representatives, shall establish and maintain a website that 876 provides information relating to the approved operating budget 877 for each branch of state government and state agency. 878 (a)âAt a minimum, the information must include: 879 1.âDisbursement data for each appropriation by the account 880 value object code associated with each expenditure established 881 within the Financial Management Florida Accounting Information 882 Resource Subsystem. Expenditure data must include the name of 883 the payee, the date of the expenditure, the amount of the 884 expenditure, and the voucher statewide document number. Such 885 data must be searchable by the name of the payee, the paying 886 agency, and fiscal year, and must be downloadable in a format 887 that allows offline analysis. 888 2.âFor each appropriation, any adjustments, including 889 vetoes, approved supplemental appropriations included in 890 legislation other than the General Appropriations Act, budget 891 amendments, other actions approved pursuant to chapter 216, and 892 other adjustments authorized by law. 893 3.âStatus of spending authority for each appropriation in 894 the approved operating budget, including released, unreleased, 895 reserved, and disbursed balances. 896 4.âPosition and rate information for positions provided in 897 the General Appropriations Act or approved through an amendment 898 to the approved operating budget and position information for 899 positions established in the legislative branch. 900 5.âAllotments for planned expenditures of state 901 appropriations established by state agencies in the Financial 902 Management Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem, 903 and the current balances of such allotments. 904 6.âTrust fund balance reports, including cash available, 905 investments, and receipts. 906 7.âGeneral revenue fund balance reports, including revenue 907 received and amounts disbursed. 908 8.âFixed capital outlay project data, including original 909 appropriation and disbursements throughout the life of the 910 project. 911 9.âA 10-year history of appropriations indicated by agency. 912 10.âLinks to state audits or reports related to the 913 expenditure and dispersal of state funds. 914 11.âLinks to program or activity descriptions for which 915 funds may be expended. 916 Section 11.âSubsections (1) and (2) and paragraph (f) of 917 subsection (3) of section 216.102, Florida Statutes, are amended 918 to read: 919 216.102âFiling of financial information; handling by Chief 920 Financial Officer; penalty for noncompliance.â 921 (1)âBy September 30 of each year, each agency supported by 922 any form of taxation, licenses, fees, imposts, or exactions, the 923 judicial branch, and, for financial reporting purposes, each 924 component unit of the state as determined by the Chief Financial 925 Officer shall prepare, using generally accepted accounting 926 principles, and file with the Chief Financial Officer the 927 financial and other information necessary for the preparation of 928 annual financial statements for the State of Florida as of June 929 30. In addition, each such agency and the judicial branch shall 930 prepare financial statements showing the financial position and 931 results of agency or branch operations as of June 30 for 932 internal management purposes. 933 (a)âEach state agency and the judicial branch shall record 934 the receipt and disbursement of funds from federal sources in a 935 form and format prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer. The 936 access to federal funds by the administering agencies or the 937 judicial branch may not be authorized until: 938 1.âThe deposit has been recorded in the Financial 939 Management Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem 940 using proper, consistent codes that designate deposits as 941 federal funds. 942 2.âThe deposit and appropriate recording required by this 943 paragraph have been verified by the office of the Chief 944 Financial Officer. 945 (b)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall publish a statewide 946 policy detailing the requirements for recording receipt and 947 disbursement of federal funds into the Financial Management 948 Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem and provide 949 technical assistance to the agencies and the judicial branch to 950 implement the policy. 951 (2)âFinancial information must be contained within the 952 Financial Management Florida Accounting Information Resource 953 Subsystem. Other information must be submitted in the form and 954 format prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer. 955 (a)âEach component unit shall file financial information 956 and other information necessary for the preparation of annual 957 financial statements with the agency or branch designated by the 958 Chief Financial Officer by the date specified by the Chief 959 Financial Officer. 960 (b)âThe state agency or branch designated by the Chief 961 Financial Officer to receive financial information and other 962 information from component units shall include the financial 963 information in the Financial Management Florida Accounting 964 Information Resource Subsystem and shall include the component 965 unitsâ other information in its submission to the Chief 966 Financial Officer. 967 (3)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall: 968 (f)âConsult with and elicit comments from the Executive 969 Office of the Governor on changes to the Financial Management 970 Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem which clearly 971 affect the accounting of federal funds, so as to ensure 972 consistency of information entered into the Federal Aid Tracking 973 System by state executive and judicial branch entities. While 974 efforts shall be made to ensure the compatibility of the 975 Financial Management Florida Accounting Information Resource 976 Subsystem and the Federal Aid Tracking System, any successive 977 systems serving identical or similar functions shall preserve 978 such compatibility. 979 980 The Chief Financial Officer may furnish and publish in 981 electronic form the financial statements and the annual 982 comprehensive financial report required under paragraphs (a), 983 (b), and (c). 984 Section 12.âSubsection (3) of section 216.141, Florida 985 Statutes, is amended to read: 986 216.141âBudget system procedures; planning and programming 987 by state agencies.â 988 (3)âThe Chief Financial Officer, as chief fiscal officer, 989 shall use the Financial Management Florida Accounting 990 Information Resource Subsystem developed pursuant to s. 991 215.94(2) for account purposes in the performance of and 992 accounting for all of his or her constitutional and statutory 993 duties and responsibilities. However, state agencies and the 994 judicial branch continue to be responsible for maintaining 995 accounting records necessary for effective management of their 996 programs and functions. 997 Section 13.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (7) and 998 paragraph (j) of subsection (12) of section 440.13, Florida 999 Statutes, are amended to read: 1000 440.13âMedical services and supplies; penalty for 1001 violations; limitations.â 1002 (7)âUTILIZATION AND REIMBURSEMENT DISPUTES.â 1003 (a)âAny health care provider who elects to contest the 1004 disallowance or adjustment of payment by a carrier under 1005 subsection (6) must, within 60 45 days after receipt of notice 1006 of disallowance or adjustment of payment, petition the 1007 department to resolve the dispute. The petitioner must serve, by 1008 United States Postal Service certified mail or by a common 1009 carrier with verifiable tracking methods, a copy of the petition 1010 on the carrier and on all affected parties listed on the notice 1011 of disallowance or adjustment by certified mail. The petition 1012 must be accompanied by all documents and records that support 1013 the allegations contained in the petition. Failure of a 1014 petitioner to submit such documentation to the department 1015 results in dismissal of the petition. 1016 (b)âThe carrier must submit to the department within 45 30 1017 days after receipt of the petition all documentation 1018 substantiating the carrierâs disallowance or adjustment. Failure 1019 of the carrier to timely submit such documentation to the 1020 department within 45 30 days constitutes a waiver of all 1021 objections to the petition. 1022 (12)âCREATION OF THREE-MEMBER PANEL; GUIDES OF MAXIMUM 1023 REIMBURSEMENT ALLOWANCES.â 1024 (j)âIn addition to establishing the uniform schedule of 1025 maximum reimbursement allowances, the panel shall: 1026 1.âTake testimony, receive records, and collect data to 1027 evaluate the adequacy of the workersâ compensation fee schedule, 1028 nationally recognized fee schedules and alternative methods of 1029 reimbursement to health care providers and health care 1030 facilities for inpatient and outpatient treatment and care. 1031 2.âSurvey health care providers and health care facilities 1032 to determine the availability and accessibility of workersâ 1033 compensation health care delivery systems for injured workers. 1034 3.âSurvey carriers to determine the estimated impact on 1035 carrier costs and workersâ compensation premium rates by 1036 implementing changes to the carrier reimbursement schedule or 1037 implementing alternative reimbursement methods. 1038 4.âSubmit recommendations on or before January 15, 2031 1039 2017, and every 5 years biennially thereafter, to the President 1040 of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives on 1041 methods to improve the workersâ compensation health care 1042 delivery system. 1043 1044 The department, as requested, shall provide data to the panel, 1045 including, but not limited to, utilization trends in the 1046 workersâ compensation health care delivery system. The 1047 department shall provide the panel with an annual report 1048 regarding the resolution of medical reimbursement disputes and 1049 any actions pursuant to subsection (8). The department shall 1050 provide administrative support and service to the panel to the 1051 extent requested by the panel. The department may adopt rules 1052 pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this 1053 subsection. For prescription medication purchased under the 1054 requirements of this subsection, a dispensing practitioner shall 1055 not possess such medication unless payment has been made by the 1056 practitioner, the practitionerâs professional practice, or the 1057 practitionerâs practice management company or employer to the 1058 supplying manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, or drug 1059 repackager within 60 days of the dispensing practitioner taking 1060 possession of that medication. 1061 Section 14.âSection 497.1411, Florida Statutes, is created 1062 to read: 1063 497.1411âDisqualification of applicants and licenses; 1064 penalties against licensees; rulemaking.â 1065 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âapplicantâ 1066 means an individual applying for licensure or relicensure under 1067 this chapter, or an officer, a director, a majority owner, a 1068 partner, a manager, or other person who manages or controls an 1069 entity applying for licensure or relicensure under this chapter. 1070 (2)âAn applicant who has been found guilty of or has 1071 pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any of the following 1072 offenses, regardless of adjudication, is permanently barred from 1073 licensure under this chapter: 1074 (a)âA felony of the first degree. 1075 (b)âA felony involving conduct prohibited under chapter 1076 497, chapter 787, chapter 794, chapter 796, chapter 800, chapter 1077 825, chapter 827, or chapter 847. 1078 (c)âA felony involving moral turpitude. 1079 (3)âAn applicant who has been found guilty of, or has 1080 entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an offense not 1081 subject to the permanent bar under subsection (2), regardless of 1082 adjudication, is subject to the following disqualifying periods: 1083 (a)âA 10-year disqualifying period for any felony to which 1084 the permanent bar in subsection (2) does not apply. 1085 Notwithstanding subsection (4), an applicant who has completed 1086 at least one-half of the disqualifying period may apply for a 1087 probationary license for the remainder of the disqualifying 1088 period if, during that time, the applicant has not been found 1089 guilty of, or has not entered a plea of guilty or nolo 1090 contendere to, any offense. 1091 (b)âA 5-year disqualifying period for all misdemeanors 1092 directly related to chapter 497. 1093 (4)âThe board shall adopt rules to administer this section. 1094 Such rules must provide additional disqualifying periods for 1095 applicants who have committed multiple criminal offenses and may 1096 provide additional factors for disqualification reasonably 1097 related to the applicantâs criminal history. The rules must also 1098 establish mitigating and aggravating factors. However, 1099 mitigation may not reduce any disqualifying period to less than 1100 5 years and may not be applied to reduce the 5-year 1101 disqualifying period provided in paragraph (3)(b). 1102 (5)âFor purposes of this section, a disqualifying period 1103 begins upon the applicantâs final release from supervision or 1104 upon completion of the applicantâs criminal sentence. The board 1105 may not approve issuance of a license to an applicant until the 1106 applicant provides proof that all related fines, court costs, 1107 fees, and court-ordered restitution have been paid. 1108 (6)âAfter the disqualifying period has expired, the burden 1109 is on the applicant to demonstrate to the board that he or she 1110 has been rehabilitated, does not pose a risk to the public, is 1111 fit and trustworthy to engage in business regulated by this 1112 chapter, and is otherwise qualified for licensure. 1113 (7)âNotwithstanding subsections (2) and (3), an applicant 1114 who has been found guilty of, or has pleaded guilty or nolo 1115 contendere to, a crime in subsection (2) or subsection (3), and 1116 who has subsequently been granted a pardon or the restoration of 1117 civil rights pursuant to chapter 940 and s. 8, Art. IV of the 1118 State Constitution, or a pardon or the restoration of civil 1119 rights under the laws of another jurisdiction with respect to a 1120 conviction in that jurisdiction, is not barred or disqualified 1121 from licensure under this chapter; however, such a pardon or 1122 restoration of civil rights does not require the board to award 1123 such license. 1124 (8)(a)âThe board may grant an exemption from 1125 disqualification to any person disqualified from licensure under 1126 subsection (3) if: 1127 1.âThe applicant has paid in full any fee, fine, fund, 1128 lien, civil judgment, restitution, or cost of prosecution 1129 imposed by the court as part of the judgment and sentence for 1130 any disqualifying offense; and 1131 2.âAt least 2 years have elapsed since the applicant 1132 completed or has been lawfully released from confinement, 1133 supervision, or any nonmonetary condition imposed by the court 1134 for a disqualifying offense. 1135 (b)âFor the board to grant an exemption under this 1136 subsection, the applicant must clearly and convincingly 1137 demonstrate that he or she would not pose a risk to persons or 1138 property if licensed under this chapter, evidence of which must 1139 include, but need not be limited to, facts and circumstances 1140 surrounding the disqualifying offense, the time that has elapsed 1141 since the offense, the nature of the offense and harm caused to 1142 the victim, the applicantâs history before and after the 1143 offense, and any other evidence or circumstances indicating that 1144 the applicant will not present a danger if licensed or 1145 certified. 1146 (c)âThe board has discretion whether to grant or deny an 1147 exemption under this subsection. The boardâs decision is subject 1148 to chapter 120. 1149 (9)âThe disqualification periods provided in this section 1150 do not apply to the renewal of a license or to a new application 1151 for licensure if the applicant has an active license as of July 1152 1, 2026, and the applicable criminal history was considered by 1153 the board on the prior approval of any active license held by 1154 the applicant. This section does not affect any criminal history 1155 disclosure requirements of this chapter. 1156 Section 15.âSubsection (9) and paragraph (c) of subsection 1157 (10) of section 497.142, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1158 497.142âLicensing; fingerprinting and criminal background 1159 checks.â 1160 (9)âIf any applicant under this chapter has been, within 1161 the 10 years preceding the application under this chapter, 1162 convicted or found guilty of, or entered a plea of nolo 1163 contendere to, regardless of adjudication, any crime in any 1164 jurisdiction, the application may shall not be deemed complete 1165 until such time as the applicant provides such certified true 1166 copies of the court records evidencing the conviction, finding, 1167 or plea, as required in this section or as the licensing 1168 authority may by rule require. 1169 (10) 1170 (c)âCrimes to be disclosed are: 1171 1.âAny felony or misdemeanor, no matter when committed, 1172 that was directly or indirectly related to or involving any 1173 aspect of the practice or business of funeral directing, 1174 embalming, direct disposition, cremation, funeral or cemetery 1175 preneed sales, funeral establishment operations, cemetery 1176 operations, or cemetery monument or marker sales or 1177 installation. 1178 2.âAny misdemeanor, no matter when committed, that was 1179 directly related to the practice or activities regulated Any 1180 other felony not already disclosed under subparagraph 1. that 1181 was committed within the 20 years immediately preceding the 1182 application under this chapter. 1183 3.âAny other misdemeanor not already disclosed under 1184 subparagraph 2. which subparagraph 1. that was committed within 1185 the 5 years immediately preceding the application under this 1186 chapter. 1187 Section 16.âSubsection (11) is added to section 553.80, 1188 Florida Statutes, to read: 1189 553.80âEnforcement.â 1190 (11)âFor purposes of the design, construction, erection, 1191 alteration, fire protection, fire suppression, modification, 1192 repair, and demolition of a single-family or two-family 1193 dwelling, such dwelling does not have a change of occupancy as 1194 defined in the Florida Building Code solely due to its being 1195 used as or converted into a dwelling used: 1196 (a)âBy a tax-exempt charitable organization under s. 1197 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code whose stated corporate 1198 purpose relates to the support of people who are living with a 1199 mental health disorder, provided the dwelling has no fewer than 1200 two and no more than four bedrooms, is occupied by a group of or 1201 family of no more than six ambulatory adults living with a 1202 mental disorder, and has no more than two adults assigned to any 1203 bedroom; or 1204 (b)âFor residential migrant housing as defined in s. 1205 381.008(8) which has a permit from the Department of Health 1206 pursuant to s. 381.0081. 1207 Section 17.âSubsection (10) of section 560.309, Florida 1208 Statutes, is amended to read: 1209 560.309âConduct of business.â 1210 (10)âIf a check is returned to a licensee from a payor 1211 financial institution due to lack of funds, a closed account, or 1212 a stop-payment order, the licensee may seek collection pursuant 1213 to s. 68.065. In seeking collection, the licensee must comply 1214 with the prohibitions against harassment or abuse, false or 1215 misleading representations, and unfair practices in the Florida 1216 Consumer Collection Practices Act under part VI of chapter 559, 1217 including s. 559.77. The licensee must also comply with the Fair 1218 Debt Collections Practices Act, 15 U.S.C. ss. 1692d, 1692e, and 1219 1692f if the licensee uses a third-party debt collector or any 1220 name other than its own to collect such debts. A violation of 1221 this subsection is a deceptive and unfair trade practice and 1222 constitutes a violation of the Deceptive and Unfair Trade 1223 Practices Act under part II of chapter 501. In addition, a 1224 licensee must comply with the applicable provisions of the 1225 Consumer Collection Practices Act under part VI of chapter 559, 1226 including s. 559.77. 1227 Section 18.âSubsection (3) of section 560.405, Florida 1228 Statutes, is amended to read: 1229 560.405âDeposit; redemption.â 1230 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (1), in lieu of presentment, 1231 a deferred presentment provider may allow the check to be 1232 redeemed at any time upon payment of the outstanding transaction 1233 balance and earned fees. Redemption in cash or through a debit 1234 card transaction must be treated the same. However, payment may 1235 not be made in the form of a personal check or through a credit 1236 card transaction. Upon redemption, the deferred presentment 1237 provider must return the drawerâs check and provide a signed, 1238 dated receipt showing that the drawerâs check has been redeemed. 1239 Section 19.âSubsection (2) of section 560.406, Florida 1240 Statutes, is amended to read: 1241 560.406âWorthless checks.â 1242 (2)âIf a check is returned to a deferred presentment 1243 provider from a payor financial institution due to insufficient 1244 funds, a closed account, or a stop-payment order, the deferred 1245 presentment provider may pursue all legally available civil 1246 remedies to collect the check, including, but not limited to, 1247 the imposition of all charges imposed on the deferred 1248 presentment provider by the financial institution. In its 1249 collection practices, a deferred presentment provider must 1250 comply with the prohibitions against harassment or abuse, false 1251 or misleading representations, and unfair practices that are 1252 contained in the Florida Consumer Collection Practices Act under 1253 part VI of chapter 559, including s. 559.77. A deferred 1254 presentment provider must also comply with the Fair Debt 1255 Collections Practices Act, 15 U.S.C. ss. 1692d, 1692e, and 1692f 1256 if the deferred presentment provider uses a third-party debt 1257 collector or any name other than its own to collect such debts. 1258 A violation of this act is a deceptive and unfair trade practice 1259 and constitutes a violation of the Deceptive and Unfair Trade 1260 Practices Act under part II of chapter 501. In addition, a 1261 deferred presentment provider must comply with the applicable 1262 provisions of the Consumer Collection Practices Act under part 1263 VI of chapter 559, including s. 559.77. 1264 Section 20.âSubsection (3) of section 626.0428, Florida 1265 Statutes, is amended to read: 1266 626.0428âAgency personnel powers, duties, and limitations.â 1267 (3)âAn employee or an authorized representative located at 1268 a designated branch of an agent or agency may not initiate 1269 contact with any person for the purpose of soliciting insurance 1270 unless licensed and appointed as an agent or customer 1271 representative. As to title insurance, an employee of an agent 1272 or agency may not initiate contact with any individual proposed 1273 insured for the purpose of soliciting title insurance unless 1274 licensed as a title insurance agent or exempt from such 1275 licensure pursuant to s. 626.8417(4) and (5). 1276 Section 21.âSection 626.171, Florida Statutes, is amended 1277 to read: 1278 626.171âApplication for license as an agent, customer 1279 representative, adjuster, or service representative, or 1280 reinsurance intermediary.â 1281 (1)âThe department may not issue a license as agent, 1282 customer representative, adjuster, or service representative, or 1283 reinsurance intermediary to any person except upon written 1284 application filed with the department, meeting the 1285 qualifications for the license applied for as determined by the 1286 department, and payment in advance of all applicable fees. The 1287 application must be made under the oath of the applicant and be 1288 signed by the applicant. An applicant may permit a third party 1289 to complete, submit, and sign an application on the applicantâs 1290 behalf, but is responsible for ensuring that the information on 1291 the application is true and correct and is accountable for any 1292 misstatements or misrepresentations. The department shall accept 1293 the uniform application for resident and nonresident agent and 1294 adjuster licensing. The department may adopt revised versions of 1295 the uniform application by rule. 1296 (2)âIn the application, the applicant must include all of 1297 the following shall set forth: 1298 (a)âThe applicantâs His or her full name, age, social 1299 security number, residence address, business address, mailing 1300 address, contact telephone numbers, including a business 1301 telephone number, and e-mail address. 1302 (b)âA statement indicating the method the applicant used or 1303 is using to meet any required prelicensing education, knowledge, 1304 experience, or instructional requirements for the type of 1305 license applied for. 1306 (c)âWhether the applicant he or she has been refused or has 1307 voluntarily surrendered or has had suspended or revoked a 1308 license to solicit insurance by the department or by the 1309 supervising officials of any state. 1310 (d)âWhether any insurer or any managing general agent 1311 claims the applicant is indebted under any agency contract or 1312 otherwise and, if so, the name of the claimant, the nature of 1313 the claim, and the applicantâs defense thereto, if any. 1314 (e)âProof that the applicant meets the requirements for the 1315 type of license for which he or she is applying. 1316 (f)âThe applicantâs gender (male or female). 1317 (g)âThe applicantâs native language. 1318 (h)âThe highest level of education achieved by the 1319 applicant. 1320 (i)âThe applicantâs race or ethnicity (African American, 1321 white, American Indian, Asian, Hispanic, or other). 1322 (j)âSuch other or additional information as the department 1323 may deem proper to enable it to determine the character, 1324 experience, ability, and other qualifications of the applicant 1325 to hold himself or herself out to the public as an insurance 1326 representative. 1327 1328 However, the application must contain a statement that an 1329 applicant is not required to disclose his or her race or 1330 ethnicity, gender, or native language, that he or she will not 1331 be penalized for not doing so, and that the department will use 1332 this information exclusively for research and statistical 1333 purposes and to improve the quality and fairness of the 1334 examinations. The department may shall make provisions for 1335 applicants to voluntarily submit their cellular telephone 1336 numbers as part of the application process solely on a voluntary 1337 basis only for the purpose of two-factor authentication of 1338 secure login credentials only. 1339 (3)âEach application must be accompanied by payment of any 1340 applicable fee. 1341 (4)âAn applicant for a license issued by the department 1342 under this chapter must submit a set of the individual 1343 applicantâs fingerprints, or, if the applicant is not an 1344 individual, a set of the fingerprints of the sole proprietor, 1345 majority owner, partners, officers, and directors, to the 1346 department and must pay the fingerprint processing fee set forth 1347 in s. 624.501. Fingerprints must be processed in accordance with 1348 s. 624.34 and used to investigate the applicantâs qualifications 1349 pursuant to s. 626.201. The fingerprints must be taken by a law 1350 enforcement agency or other department-approved entity. The 1351 department may not approve an application for licensure as an 1352 agent, customer service representative, adjuster, or service 1353 representative, or reinsurance intermediary if fingerprints have 1354 not been submitted. 1355 (5)âThe application for license filing fee prescribed in s. 1356 624.501 is not subject to refund. 1357 (6)âMembers of the United States Armed Forces and their 1358 spouses, and veterans of the United States Armed Forces who have 1359 separated from service within 24 months before application for 1360 licensure, are exempt from the application filing fee prescribed 1361 in s. 624.501. Qualified individuals must provide a copy of a 1362 military identification card, military dependent identification 1363 card, military service record, military personnel file, veteran 1364 record, discharge paper or separation document that indicates 1365 such members are currently in good standing or such veterans 1366 were honorably discharged. 1367 (7)âPursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and 1368 Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, each party is 1369 required to provide his or her social security number in 1370 accordance with this section. Disclosure of social security 1371 numbers obtained through this requirement must be limited to the 1372 purpose of administration of the Title IV-D program for child 1373 support enforcement. 1374 Section 22.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 1375 626.292, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1376 626.292âTransfer of license from another state.â 1377 (2)âTo qualify for a license transfer, an individual 1378 applicant must meet the following requirements: 1379 (c)âThe individual must submit a completed application for 1380 this state which is received by the department within 90 days 1381 after the date the individual became a resident of this state, 1382 along with payment of the applicable fees set forth in s. 1383 624.501 and submission of the following documents: 1384 1.âA certification issued by the appropriate official of 1385 the applicantâs home state identifying the type of license and 1386 lines of authority under the license and stating that, at the 1387 time the license from the home state was canceled, the applicant 1388 was in good standing in that state or that the stateâs Producer 1389 Database records, maintained by the National Association of 1390 Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates, or subsidiaries, 1391 indicate that the agent or all-lines adjuster is or was licensed 1392 in good standing for the line of authority requested. An 1393 applicant may hold a resident license in another state for 30 1394 days after the Florida resident license has been issued to 1395 facilitate the transfer of licensure between states. 1396 2.âA set of the applicantâs fingerprints in accordance with 1397 s. 626.171(4). 1398 Section 23.âSubsection (1) of section 626.611, Florida 1399 Statutes, is amended to read: 1400 626.611âGrounds for compulsory refusal, suspension, or 1401 revocation of agentâs, title agencyâs, adjusterâs, customer 1402 representativeâs, service representativeâs, or managing general 1403 agentâs license or appointment.â 1404 (1)âThe department shall require license reexamination, 1405 deny an application for, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew or 1406 continue the license or appointment of any applicant, agent, 1407 title agency, adjuster, customer representative, service 1408 representative, or managing general agent, and it shall suspend 1409 or revoke the eligibility to hold a license or appointment of 1410 any such person, if it finds that as to the applicant, licensee, 1411 or appointee any one or more of the following applicable grounds 1412 exist: 1413 (a)âLack of one or more of the qualifications for the 1414 license or appointment as specified in this code. 1415 (b)âMaterial misstatement, misrepresentation, or fraud in 1416 obtaining the license or appointment or in attempting to obtain 1417 the license or appointment. 1418 (c)âFailure to pass to the satisfaction of the department 1419 any examination required under this code, including cheating on 1420 an examination required for licensure or violating test center 1421 or examination procedures delivered orally, in writing, or 1422 electronically at the test site by authorized representatives of 1423 the examination program administrator. 1424 (d)âIf the license or appointment is willfully used, or to 1425 be used, to circumvent any of the requirements or prohibitions 1426 of this code. 1427 (e)âWillful misrepresentation of any insurance policy or 1428 annuity contract or willful deception with regard to any such 1429 policy or contract, done either in person or by any form of 1430 dissemination of information or advertising. 1431 (f)âIf, as an adjuster, or agent licensed and appointed to 1432 adjust claims under this code, he or she has materially 1433 misrepresented to an insured or other interested party the terms 1434 and coverage of an insurance contract with intent and for the 1435 purpose of effecting settlement of claim for loss or damage or 1436 benefit under such contract on less favorable terms than those 1437 provided in and contemplated by the contract. 1438 (g)âDemonstrated lack of fitness or trustworthiness to 1439 engage in the business of insurance. 1440 (h)âDemonstrated lack of reasonably adequate knowledge and 1441 technical competence to engage in the transactions authorized by 1442 the license or appointment. 1443 (i)âFraudulent or dishonest practices in the conduct of 1444 business under the license or appointment. 1445 (j)âMisappropriation, conversion, or unlawful withholding 1446 of moneys belonging to insurers or insureds or beneficiaries or 1447 to others and received in conduct of business under the license 1448 or appointment. 1449 (k)âUnlawfully rebating, attempting to unlawfully rebate, 1450 or unlawfully dividing or offering to divide his or her 1451 commission with another. 1452 (l)âHaving obtained or attempted to obtain, or having used 1453 or using, a license or appointment as agent or customer 1454 representative for the purpose of soliciting or handling 1455 âcontrolled businessâ as defined in s. 626.730 with respect to 1456 general lines agents, s. 626.784 with respect to life agents, 1457 and s. 626.830 with respect to health agents. 1458 (m)âWillful failure to comply with, or willful violation 1459 of, any proper order or rule of the department or willful 1460 violation of any provision of this code. 1461 (n)âHaving been found guilty of or having pleaded guilty or 1462 nolo contendere to a misdemeanor directly related to the 1463 financial services business, any felony, or any crime punishable 1464 by imprisonment of 1 year or more under the law of the United 1465 States of America or of any state thereof or under the law of 1466 any other country, without regard to whether a judgment of 1467 conviction has been entered by the court having jurisdiction of 1468 such cases. 1469 (o)âFraudulent or dishonest practice in submitting or 1470 aiding or abetting any person in the submission of an 1471 application for workersâ compensation coverage under chapter 440 1472 containing false or misleading information as to employee 1473 payroll or classification for the purpose of avoiding or 1474 reducing the amount of premium due for such coverage. 1475 (p)âSale of an unregistered security that was required to 1476 be registered, pursuant to chapter 517. 1477 (q)âIn transactions related to viatical settlement 1478 contracts as defined in s. 626.9911: 1479 1.âCommission of a fraudulent or dishonest act. 1480 2.âNo longer meeting the requirements for initial 1481 licensure. 1482 3.âHaving received a fee, commission, or other valuable 1483 consideration for his or her services with respect to viatical 1484 settlements that involved unlicensed viatical settlement 1485 providers or persons who offered or attempted to negotiate on 1486 behalf of another person a viatical settlement contract as 1487 defined in s. 626.9911 and who were not licensed life agents. 1488 4.âDealing in bad faith with viators. 1489 Section 24.âSection 626.621, Florida Statutes, is amended 1490 to read: 1491 626.621âGrounds for discretionary refusal, suspension, or 1492 revocation of agentâs, adjusterâs, customer representativeâs, 1493 service representativeâs, or managing general agentâs license or 1494 appointment.âThe department may, in its discretion, require a 1495 license reexamination, deny an application for, suspend, revoke, 1496 or refuse to renew or continue the license or appointment of any 1497 applicant, agent, adjuster, customer representative, service 1498 representative, or managing general agent, and it may suspend or 1499 revoke the eligibility to hold a license or appointment of any 1500 such person, if it finds that as to the applicant, licensee, or 1501 appointee any one or more of the following applicable grounds 1502 exist under circumstances for which such denial, suspension, 1503 revocation, or refusal is not mandatory under s. 626.611: 1504 (1)âAny cause for which issuance of the license or 1505 appointment could have been refused had it then existed and been 1506 known to the department. 1507 (2)âViolation of any provision of this code or of any other 1508 law applicable to the business of insurance in the course of 1509 dealing under the license or appointment. 1510 (3)âViolation of any lawful order or rule of the 1511 department, commission, or office. 1512 (4)âFailure or refusal, upon demand, to pay over to any 1513 insurer he or she represents or has represented any money coming 1514 into his or her hands belonging to the insurer. 1515 (5)âViolation of the provision against twisting, as defined 1516 in s. 626.9541(1)(l). 1517 (6)âIn the conduct of business under the license or 1518 appointment, engaging in unfair methods of competition or in 1519 unfair or deceptive acts or practices, as prohibited under part 1520 IX of this chapter, or having otherwise shown himself or herself 1521 to be a source of injury or loss to the public. 1522 (7)âWillful overinsurance of any property or health 1523 insurance risk. 1524 (8)âIf a life agent, violation of the code of ethics. 1525 (9)âCheating on an examination required for licensure or 1526 violating test center or examination procedures published 1527 orally, in writing, or electronically at the test site by 1528 authorized representatives of the examination program 1529 administrator. Communication of test center and examination 1530 procedures must be clearly established and documented. 1531 (10)âFailure to inform the department in writing within 30 1532 days after pleading guilty or nolo contendere to, or being 1533 convicted or found guilty of, any felony or a crime punishable 1534 by imprisonment of 1 year or more under the law of the United 1535 States or of any state thereof, or under the law of any other 1536 country without regard to whether a judgment of conviction has 1537 been entered by the court having jurisdiction of the case. 1538 (11)âKnowingly aiding, assisting, procuring, advising, or 1539 abetting any person in the violation of or to violate a 1540 provision of the insurance code or any order or rule of the 1541 department, commission, or office. 1542 (12)âHas been the subject of or has had a license, permit, 1543 appointment, registration, or other authority to conduct 1544 business subject to any decision, finding, injunction, 1545 suspension, prohibition, revocation, denial, judgment, final 1546 agency action, or administrative order by any court of competent 1547 jurisdiction, administrative law proceeding, state agency, 1548 federal agency, national securities, commodities, or option 1549 exchange, or national securities, commodities, or option 1550 association involving a violation of any federal or state 1551 securities or commodities law or any rule or regulation adopted 1552 thereunder, or a violation of any rule or regulation of any 1553 national securities, commodities, or options exchange or 1554 national securities, commodities, or options association. 1555 (13)âFailure to comply with any civil, criminal, or 1556 administrative action taken by the child support enforcement 1557 program under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1558 ss. 651 et seq., to determine paternity or to establish, modify, 1559 enforce, or collect support. 1560 (14)âDirectly or indirectly accepting any compensation, 1561 inducement, or reward from an inspector for the referral of the 1562 owner of the inspected property to the inspector or inspection 1563 company. This prohibition applies to an inspection intended for 1564 submission to an insurer in order to obtain property insurance 1565 coverage or establish the applicable property insurance premium. 1566 (15)âDenial, suspension, or revocation of, or any other 1567 adverse administrative action against, a license to practice or 1568 conduct any regulated profession, business, or vocation by this 1569 state, any other state, any nation, any possession or district 1570 of the United States, any court, or any lawful agency thereof. 1571 (16)âTaking an action that allows the personal financial or 1572 medical information of a consumer or customer to be made 1573 available or accessible to the general public, regardless of the 1574 format in which the record is stored. 1575 (17)âInitiating in-person or telephone solicitation after 9 1576 p.m. or before 8 a.m. local time of the prospective customer 1577 unless requested by the prospective customer. 1578 (18)âCancellation of the applicantâs, licenseeâs, or 1579 appointeeâs resident license in a state other than Florida. 1580 Section 25.âSubsection (1) of section 626.731, Florida 1581 Statutes, is amended to read: 1582 626.731âQualifications for general lines agentâs license.â 1583 (1)âThe department may shall not grant or issue a license 1584 as general lines agent to any individual found by it to be 1585 untrustworthy or incompetent or who does not meet each all of 1586 the following qualifications: 1587 (a)âThe applicant is a natural person at least 18 years of 1588 age. 1589 (b)âThe applicant is a United States citizen or legal alien 1590 who possesses work authorization from the United States Bureau 1591 of Citizenship and Immigration Services and is a bona fide 1592 resident of this state. An individual who is a bona fide 1593 resident of this state shall be deemed to meet the residence 1594 requirement of this paragraph, notwithstanding the existence at 1595 the time of application for license of a license in his or her 1596 name on the records of another state as a resident licensee of 1597 such other state, if the applicant furnishes a letter of 1598 clearance satisfactory to the department that the resident 1599 licenses have been canceled or changed to a nonresident basis 1600 and that he or she is in good standing. 1601 (c)âThe applicantâs place of business will be located in 1602 this state and he or she will be actively engaged in the 1603 business of insurance and will maintain a place of business, the 1604 location of which is identifiable by and accessible to the 1605 public. 1606 (d)âThe license is not being sought for the purpose of 1607 writing or handling controlled business, in violation of s. 1608 626.730. 1609 (e)âThe applicant is qualified as to knowledge, experience, 1610 or instruction in the business of insurance and meets the 1611 requirements provided in s. 626.732. 1612 (f)âThe applicant has passed any required examination for 1613 license required under s. 626.221. 1614 Section 26.âSubsection (2) of section 626.785, Florida 1615 Statutes, is amended to read: 1616 626.785âQualifications for license.â 1617 (2)âAn individual who is a bona fide resident of this state 1618 shall be deemed to meet the residence requirement of paragraph 1619 (1)(b), notwithstanding the existence at the time of application 1620 for license of a license in his or her name on the records of 1621 another state as a resident licensee of such other state, if the 1622 applicant furnishes a letter of clearance satisfactory to the 1623 department that the resident licenses have been canceled or 1624 changed to a nonresident basis and that he or she is in good 1625 standing. 1626 Section 27.âSection 626.831, Florida Statutes, is amended 1627 to read: 1628 626.831âQualifications for license.â 1629 (1)âThe department may shall not grant or issue a license 1630 as health agent as to any individual found by it to be 1631 untrustworthy or incompetent, or who does not meet all of the 1632 following qualifications: 1633 (1)(a)âIs Must be a natural person of at least 18 years of 1634 age. 1635 (2)(b)âIs Must be a United States citizen or legal alien 1636 who possesses work authorization from the United States Bureau 1637 of Citizenship and Immigration Services and is a bona fide 1638 resident of this state. 1639 (3)(c)âIs Must not be an employee of the United States 1640 Department of Veterans Affairs or state service office, as 1641 referred to in s. 626.833. 1642 (4)(d)âHas taken Must take and passed pass any examination 1643 for license required under s. 626.221. 1644 (5)(e)âIs Must be qualified as to knowledge, experience, or 1645 instruction in the business of insurance and meets meet the 1646 requirements relative thereto provided in s. 626.8311. 1647 (2)âAn individual who is a bona fide resident of this state 1648 shall be deemed to meet the residence requirement of paragraph 1649 (1)(b), notwithstanding the existence at the time of application 1650 for license of a license in his or her name on the records of 1651 another state as a resident licensee of such other state, if the 1652 applicant furnishes a letter of clearance satisfactory to the 1653 department that the resident licenses have been canceled or 1654 changed to a nonresident basis and that he or she is in good 1655 standing. 1656 Section 28.âSubsections (4) and (5) of section 626.8417, 1657 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1658 626.8417âTitle insurance agent licensure; exemptions.â 1659 (4)âTitle insurers, acting through designated corporate 1660 officers, or attorneys duly admitted to practice law in this 1661 state and in good standing with The Florida Bar are exempt from 1662 the provisions of this chapter relating to title insurance 1663 licensing and appointment requirements. 1664 (5)âAn insurer may designate a corporate officer of the 1665 insurer to occasionally issue and countersign binders, 1666 commitments, and policies of title insurance. The designated 1667 officer is exempt from the provisions of this chapter relating 1668 to title insurance licensing and appointment requirements while 1669 the officer is acting within the scope of the designation. 1670 Section 29.âSubsection (24) is added to section 626.854, 1671 Florida Statutes, to read: 1672 626.854ââPublic adjusterâ defined; prohibitions.âThe 1673 Legislature finds that it is necessary for the protection of the 1674 public to regulate public insurance adjusters and to prevent the 1675 unauthorized practice of law. 1676 (24)âA public adjuster, public adjuster apprentice, or 1677 public adjusting firm must respond with specific information to 1678 a written or electronic request for claims status from a 1679 claimant or insured or their designated representative within 14 1680 days after the date of the request and shall document in the 1681 file the response or information provided. 1682 Section 30.âSection 627.797, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 1683 Section 31.âSubsection (11) of section 633.208, Florida 1684 Statutes, is amended to read: 1685 633.208âMinimum firesafety standards.â 1686 (11)âNotwithstanding subsection (8), a single-family or 1687 two-family dwelling may not be reclassified for purposes of 1688 enforcing the Florida Fire Prevention Code solely due to such 1689 dwelling being used as or converted into: 1690 (a)âThat is A certified recovery residence, as defined in 1691 s. 397.311, or that is a recovery residence, as defined in s. 1692 397.311, that has a charter from an entity recognized or 1693 sanctioned by Congress; 1694 (b)âA residence owned by a tax-exempt charitable 1695 organization under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code 1696 whose stated corporate purpose relates to the support of people 1697 who are living with a mental health disorder and which has no 1698 fewer than two and no more than four bedrooms, is occupied by a 1699 group or family of no more than six ambulatory adults living 1700 with a mental health disorder, and has no more than two adults 1701 assigned to any bedroom; or 1702 (c)âResidential migrant housing as defined in s. 381.008(8) 1703 which has a permit from the Department of Health pursuant to s. 1704 381.0081 may not be reclassified for purposes of enforcing the 1705 Florida Fire Prevention Code solely due to such use. 1706 Section 32.âSubsection (4) of section 648.34, Florida 1707 Statutes, is amended to read: 1708 648.34âBail bond agents; qualifications.â 1709 (4)âThe applicant must shall furnish, with his or her 1710 application, a complete set of his or her fingerprints in 1711 accordance with s. 626.171(4) and a recent credential-sized, 1712 fullface photograph of the applicant. The department may shall 1713 not authorize an applicant to take the required examination 1714 until the department has received a report from the Department 1715 of Law Enforcement and the Federal Bureau of Investigation 1716 relative to the existence or nonexistence of a criminal history 1717 report based on the applicantâs fingerprints. 1718 Section 33.âSubsection (2) of section 648.382, Florida 1719 Statutes, is amended to read: 1720 648.382âAppointment of bail bond agents and bail bond 1721 agencies; effective date of appointment.â 1722 (2)âBefore any appointment, an appropriate officer or 1723 official of the appointing insurer must obtain all of the 1724 following information submit: 1725 (a)âA certified statement or affidavit to the department 1726 stating what investigation has been made concerning the proposed 1727 appointee and the proposed appointeeâs background and the 1728 appointing personâs opinion to the best of his or her knowledge 1729 and belief as to the moral character and reputation of the 1730 proposed appointee. In lieu of such certified statement or 1731 affidavit, by authorizing the effectuation of an appointment for 1732 a licensee, the appointing entity certifies to the department 1733 that such investigation has been made and that the results of 1734 the investigation and the appointing personâs opinion is that 1735 the proposed appointee is a person of good moral character and 1736 reputation and is fit to engage in the bail bond business.; 1737 (b)âAn affidavit under oath on a form prescribed by the 1738 department, signed by the proposed appointee, stating that 1739 premiums are not owed to any insurer and that the appointee will 1740 discharge all outstanding forfeitures and judgments on bonds 1741 previously written. If the appointee does not satisfy or 1742 discharge such forfeitures or judgments, the former insurer 1743 shall file a notice, with supporting documents, with the 1744 appointing insurer, the former agent or agency, and the 1745 department, stating under oath that the licensee has failed to 1746 timely satisfy forfeitures and judgments on bonds written and 1747 that the insurer has satisfied the forfeiture or judgment from 1748 its own funds. Upon receipt of such notification and supporting 1749 documents, the appointing insurer shall immediately cancel the 1750 licenseeâs appointment. The licensee may be reappointed only 1751 upon certification by the former insurer that all forfeitures 1752 and judgments on bonds written by the licensee have been 1753 discharged. The appointing insurer or former agent or agency 1754 may, within 10 days, file a petition with the department seeking 1755 relief from this paragraph. Filing of the petition stays the 1756 duty of the appointing insurer to cancel the appointment until 1757 the department grants or denies the petition.; 1758 (c)âAny other information that the department reasonably 1759 requires concerning the proposed appointee.; and 1760 (d)âEffective January 1, 2025, a certification that the 1761 appointing entity obtained from each appointee the following 1762 sworn statement: 1763 1764 Pursuant to section 648.382(2)(b), Florida Statutes, I 1765 do solemnly swear that I owe no premium to any insurer 1766 or agency and that I will discharge all outstanding 1767 forfeitures and judgments on bonds that have been 1768 previously written. I acknowledge that failure to do 1769 this will result in my active appointments being 1770 canceled. 1771 1772 An appointed bail bond agency must have the attestation under 1773 this paragraph signed by its owner. 1774 Section 34.âSection 717.001, Florida Statutes, is amended 1775 to read: 1776 717.001âShort title.âThis chapter may be cited as the 1777 âFlorida Disposition of Abandoned Personal Unclaimed Property 1778 Act.â 1779 Section 35.âPresent subsections (1) through (4), (5) 1780 through (8), (10) through (13), (15) through (20), (21), (22) 1781 through (28), (31), (32), and (33) of section 717.101, Florida 1782 Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (4) through (7), (9) 1783 through (12), (13) through (16), (17) through (22), (24), (26) 1784 through (32), and (33), (34), and (35), respectively, new 1785 subsections (1), (2), (3), (8), (23), and (25) are added to that 1786 section, and present subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), (8), (9), 1787 (12), (14), (16), (18), (19), (20), (22), (25), (29), and (30) 1788 of that section are amended, to read: 1789 717.101âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, unless the 1790 context otherwise requires: 1791 (1)ââAbandoned propertyâ means property held by a holder 1792 for which all of the following are true: 1793 (a)âThe apparent owner has shown no activity or indication 1794 of interest for the duration of the applicable dormancy period 1795 established under this chapter. 1796 (b)âThe holder has complied with the due diligence 1797 requirements set forth in this chapter, including the issuance 1798 of notice to the apparent owner, and has received no response or 1799 contact sufficient to demonstrate continued interest in the 1800 property. 1801 1802 For purposes of this chapter, property is presumed abandoned 1803 upon expiration of the applicable dormancy period established 1804 under this chapter. Once the dormancy period has expired, the 1805 holder must comply with the due diligence requirements set forth 1806 in s. 717.117. If the holder does not receive response or 1807 contact sufficient to demonstrate continued interest in the 1808 property after completion of its due diligence efforts, the 1809 property is deemed abandoned and subject to reporting and 1810 remittance to the department for custodial holding on behalf of 1811 the owner. 1812 (2)ââAbandoned Property Purchase Agreementâ means the form 1813 adopted by the department pursuant to s. 717.135 which must be 1814 used, without modification or amendment, by a claimant 1815 representative to purchase abandoned property from an owner. 1816 (3)ââAbandoned Property Recovery Agreementâ means the form 1817 adopted by the department pursuant to s. 717.135 which must be 1818 used, without modification or amendment, by a claimant 1819 representative to obtain consent and authority to recover 1820 abandoned property on behalf of a person. 1821 (4)(1)ââAggregateâ means the amounts reported for owners of 1822 abandoned unclaimed property of less than $10 or where there is 1823 no name for the individual or entity listed on the holderâs 1824 records, regardless of the amount to be reported. 1825 (5)(2)ââApparent ownerâ means the person whose name appears 1826 on the records of the holder as the owner of the abandoned 1827 property, but whose status as the true owner entitled to receive 1828 the property may be subject to change due to the passage of time 1829 or changes in circumstances person entitled to property held, 1830 issued, or owing by the holder. 1831 (8)ââAuthorized representativeâ means a person or an entity 1832 legally empowered to act on behalf of the apparent owner or his 1833 or her estate, including, but not limited to, an agent, a 1834 fiduciary, a personal representative, a trustee, a legal heir, a 1835 guardian, or any other individual or entity authorized by law or 1836 agreement. 1837 (9)(5)ââBanking or financial organizationâ means any and 1838 all banks, trust companies, private bankers, savings banks, 1839 industrial banks, safe-deposit companies, savings and loan 1840 associations, credit unions, savings associations, banking 1841 organizations, international bank agencies, cooperative banks, 1842 building and loan associations, and investment companies in this 1843 state, organized under or subject to the laws of this state or 1844 of the United States, including entities organized under 12 1845 U.S.C. s. 611, but does not include federal reserve banks. The 1846 term also includes any corporation, business association, or 1847 other organization that: 1848 (a)âIs a wholly or partially owned subsidiary of any 1849 banking, banking corporation, or bank holding company that 1850 performs any or all of the functions of a banking organization; 1851 or 1852 (b)âPerforms functions pursuant to the terms of a contract 1853 with any banking organization. 1854 (10)(6)ââBusiness associationâ means any for-profit or 1855 nonprofit corporation other than a public corporation; joint 1856 stock company; investment company; unincorporated association or 1857 association of two or more individuals for business purposes, 1858 whether or not for profit; partnership; joint venture; limited 1859 liability company; sole proprietorship; business trust; trust 1860 company; land bank; safe-deposit company; safekeeping 1861 depository; banking or financial organization; insurance 1862 company; federally chartered entity; utility company; transfer 1863 agent; or other business entity, whether or not for profit. 1864 (12)(8)ââClaimant Claimantâs representativeâ means an 1865 attorney who is a member in good standing with of The Florida 1866 Bar, a certified public accountant licensed in this state, or a 1867 private investigator who is duly licensed to do business in this 1868 the state, who is registered with the department, and authorized 1869 to file claims on behalf of persons with the department by the 1870 claimant to claim unclaimed property on the claimantâs behalf. 1871 The term does not include a person acting in a representative or 1872 fiduciary capacity, such as a personal representative, guardian, 1873 trustee, or attorney, whose representation is not contingent 1874 upon the discovery or location of abandoned unclaimed property, 1875 and it expressly excludes locators who engage in locating owners 1876 of abandoned property for a fee but are not registered with the 1877 department; provided, however, that any agreement entered into 1878 for the purpose of evading s. 717.135 is invalid and 1879 unenforceable. 1880 (9)ââCredit balanceâ means an account balance in the 1881 customerâs favor. 1882 (15)(12)ââDue diligenceâ means the use of reasonable and 1883 prudent methods under particular circumstances to locate 1884 apparent owners of presumed abandoned property inactive accounts 1885 using the taxpayer identification number or social security 1886 number, if known, which may include, but are not limited to, 1887 using a nationwide database, cross-indexing with other records 1888 of the holder, mailing to the last known address unless the last 1889 known address is known to be inaccurate, providing written 1890 notice as described in this chapter by e-mail electronic mail if 1891 an apparent owner has elected such delivery, or engaging a 1892 licensed agency or company capable of conducting such search and 1893 providing updated addresses. 1894 (14)ââFinancial organizationâ means a savings association, 1895 savings and loan association, savings bank, industrial bank, 1896 bank, banking organization, trust company, international bank 1897 agency, cooperative bank, building and loan association, or 1898 credit union. 1899 (18)(16)ââHolderâ means a person who is in possession of 1900 property belonging to another or who owes a debt or an 1901 obligation to another person, including, but not limited to, 1902 financial institutions, insurance companies, corporations, 1903 partnerships, fiduciaries, and government agencies: 1904 (a)âA person who is in possession or control or has custody 1905 of property or the rights to property belonging to another; is 1906 indebted to another on an obligation; or is obligated to hold 1907 for the account of, or to deliver or pay to, the owner, property 1908 subject to this chapter; or 1909 (b)âA trustee in case of a trust. 1910 (20)(18)ââIntangible propertyâ includes, by way of 1911 illustration and not limitation: 1912 (a)âMoneys, checks, virtual currency, drafts, deposits, 1913 interest, dividends, and income. 1914 (b)âCredit balances, customer overpayments, security 1915 deposits and other instruments as defined by chapter 679, 1916 refunds, unpaid wages, unused airline tickets, and unidentified 1917 remittances. 1918 (c)âStocks, and other intangible ownership interests in 1919 business associations except for: 1920 1.âA non-freely transferable security; or 1921 2.âA security that is subject to a lien, legal hold, or 1922 restriction evidenced on the records of the holder or imposed by 1923 operation of law, if the lien, legal hold, or restriction 1924 restricts the holderâs or ownerâs ability to receive, transfer, 1925 sell, or otherwise negotiate the security. 1926 (d)âMoneys deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, bearer bonds, 1927 original issue discount bonds, coupons, and other securities, or 1928 to make distributions. 1929 (e)âAmounts due and payable under the terms of insurance 1930 policies. 1931 (f)âAmounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund 1932 established under a plan to provide any health, welfare, 1933 pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, 1934 profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment 1935 insurance, or similar benefit. 1936 (21)(19)ââLast known addressâ means a description of the 1937 location of the apparent owner sufficient for the purpose of the 1938 delivery of mail. For the purposes of identifying, reporting, 1939 and remitting property to the department which is presumed to be 1940 unclaimed, the term âlast known addressâ includes any partial 1941 description of the location of the apparent owner sufficient to 1942 establish the apparent owner was a resident of this state at the 1943 time of last contact with the apparent owner or at the time the 1944 property became due and payable. 1945 (22)(20)ââLawful chargesâ means charges against the 1946 property or the account in which the property is held which 1947 dormant accounts that are authorized by statute for the purpose 1948 of offsetting the costs of maintaining the property or the 1949 account in which the property is held dormant account. 1950 (23)ââLocatorâ means a private individual or business that 1951 locates owners of abandoned property in exchange for a fee, 1952 typically a percentage of the recovered property. Locators are 1953 not employees or agents of the state and are not registered with 1954 the department. 1955 (25)ââNon-freely transferable securityâ means a security 1956 that cannot be delivered to the administrator by the Depository 1957 Trust and Clearing Corporation or similar custodian of 1958 securities providing post-trade clearing and settlement services 1959 to financial markets or cannot be delivered because there is no 1960 agent to effect transfer. The term includes a worthless 1961 security. 1962 (26)(22)ââOwnerâ means the a person, or the personâs legal 1963 representative, entitled to receive or having a legal or 1964 equitable interest in the abandoned property. An owner 1965 establishes his or her entitlement by filing a valid claim with 1966 the department pursuant or claim against property subject to 1967 this chapter; a depositor in the case of a deposit; a 1968 beneficiary in the case of a trust or a deposit in trust; or a 1969 payee in the case of a negotiable instrument or other intangible 1970 property. 1971 (29)(25)ââRecordâ means information that is captured or 1972 maintained in any format, including written, printed, 1973 electronic, audio, visual, or other forms, and that can be made 1974 perceptible or understandable to a person, either directly or 1975 through technological means, including assistive technologies 1976 inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an 1977 electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable 1978 form. 1979 (29)ââUnclaimed Property Purchase Agreementâ means the form 1980 adopted by the department pursuant to s. 717.135 which must be 1981 used, without modification or amendment, by a claimantâs 1982 representative to purchase unclaimed property from an owner. 1983 (30)ââUnclaimed Property Recovery Agreementâ means the form 1984 adopted by the department pursuant to s. 717.135 which must be 1985 used, without modification or amendment, by a claimantâs 1986 representative to obtain an ownerâs consent and authority to 1987 recover unclaimed property on the ownerâs behalf. 1988 Section 36.âSection 717.102, Florida Statutes, is amended 1989 to read: 1990 717.102âProperty presumed abandoned unclaimed; general 1991 rule.â 1992 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided by this chapter, all 1993 intangible property, including any income or increment thereon 1994 less any lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the 1995 ordinary course of the holderâs business and for which the 1996 apparent owner or authorized representative fails to demonstrate 1997 continued interest for more than the applicable dormancy period 1998 prescribed by this chapter shall be presumed abandoned claim 1999 such property for more than 5 years after the property becomes 2000 payable or distributable is presumed unclaimed, except as 2001 otherwise provided by this chapter. Unless otherwise specified 2002 by law, the dormancy period is 5 years from the date the 2003 property becomes payable or distributable. For the purposes of 2004 this chapter, property is considered payable or distributable 2005 once the holderâs obligation to pay or deliver the property 2006 arises, regardless of whether the apparent owner or authorized 2007 representative has failed to demand or to present documents 2008 required to receive payment. 2009 (2)âProperty is payable or distributable for the purpose of 2010 this chapter notwithstanding the ownerâs failure to make demand 2011 or to present any instrument or document required to receive 2012 payment. 2013 (3)âA presumption that property is abandoned may be 2014 unclaimed is rebutted by the affirmative demonstration of 2015 continued interest by the apparent owner or authorized 2016 representative an apparent ownerâs expression of interest in the 2017 property. Such demonstration An ownerâs expression of continued 2018 interest in property includes, but is not limited to, any of the 2019 following: 2020 (a)âA record communicated by the apparent owner or 2021 authorized representative to the holder or its agent of the 2022 holder concerning the property or the account in which the 2023 property is held.; 2024 (b)âAn oral communication by the apparent owner or 2025 authorized representative to the holder or its agent of the 2026 holder concerning the property or the account in which the 2027 property is held, if the holder or its agent contemporaneously 2028 records makes and preserves evidence a record of the fact of the 2029 apparent ownerâs communication.; 2030 (c)âPresentment of a check or other instrument for of 2031 payment of a dividends dividend, interest payment, or other 2032 distributions related to the property. distribution, with 2033 respect to an account, underlying security, or interest in a 2034 business association; 2035 (d)âAny account activity initiated directed by an apparent 2036 owner or authorized representative in the account in which the 2037 property is held, including accessing the account or directing 2038 changes to information concerning the account, or to the amount 2039 or type of property held, excluding routine automatic 2040 transactions previously authorized, a direction by the apparent 2041 owner to increase, decrease, or otherwise change the amount or 2042 type of property held in the account.; 2043 (e)âAny A deposit into or withdrawal from the property or 2044 the an account in which the property is held at a financial 2045 organization, excluding an automatic deposits, withdrawals, or 2046 reinvestments deposit or withdrawal previously authorized by the 2047 apparent owner or authorized representative. an automatic 2048 reinvestment of dividends or interest, which does not constitute 2049 an expression of interest; or 2050 (f)âAny other action by the apparent owner or authorized 2051 representative which reasonably demonstrates to the holder that 2052 the apparent owner or authorized representative is aware of and 2053 maintains an interest in knows that the property exists. 2054 (3)(4)âIf a holder learns or receives confirmation of an 2055 apparent ownerâs death, the property shall be presumed abandoned 2056 unclaimed 2 years after the date of death, unless an authorized 2057 representative makes an affirmative demonstration a fiduciary 2058 appointed to represent the estate of the apparent owner has made 2059 an expression of interest in the property before the expiration 2060 of the 2-year period. This subsection may not be construed to 2061 extend the otherwise applicable dormancy period prescribed by 2062 this chapter. 2063 Section 37.âSection 717.103, Florida Statutes, is amended 2064 to read: 2065 717.103âGeneral rules for taking custody of intangible 2066 abandoned unclaimed property.âUnless otherwise provided in this 2067 chapter or by other statute of this state, intangible property 2068 is subject to the custody of the department as abandoned 2069 unclaimed property when if the conditions leading to a 2070 presumption that the property is abandoned unclaimed as 2071 described in ss. 717.102 and 717.105-717.116 are satisfied and 2072 the holder has fulfilled all required due diligence obligations 2073 without receiving any response or claim from the apparent owner, 2074 and one or more of the following criteria apply: 2075 (1)âThe last known address, as shown on the records of the 2076 holder, of the apparent owner is in this state.; 2077 (2)âThe records of the holder do not identify the name of 2078 the apparent owner, but do reflect the identity of the person 2079 entitled to the property, and it is established that the last 2080 known address of the apparent owner person entitled to the 2081 property is in this state.; 2082 (3)âThe records of the holder do not reflect the last known 2083 address of the apparent owner, but and it is established that 2084 either of the following conditions apply: 2085 (a)âThe last known address of the apparent owner person 2086 entitled to the property is in this state.; or 2087 (b)âThe holder is domiciled in this state, a domiciliary or 2088 is a government entity or governmental subdivision or agency of 2089 this state, and has not previously paid the property to the 2090 state of the last known address of the apparent owner. or other 2091 person entitled to the property; 2092 (4)âThe last known address, as shown on the records of the 2093 holder, of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the 2094 property is in a jurisdiction state that does not have 2095 applicable provide by law for the escheat, abandoned, or 2096 unclaimed property laws custodial taking of the property, or its 2097 escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the 2098 property, and the holder is domiciled in this state a 2099 domiciliary or is a government entity or governmental 2100 subdivision or agency of this state.; 2101 (5)âThe last known address, as shown on the records of the 2102 holder, of the apparent owner is in a foreign nation and the 2103 holder is domiciled in this state a domiciliary or is a 2104 government entity or governmental subdivision or agency of this 2105 state.; or 2106 (6)âThe transaction out of which the property arose 2107 occurred in this state, and both of the following are true:; 2108 (a)1.âThe last known address of the apparent owner or other 2109 person entitled to the property is unknown.; or 2110 2.âThe last known address of the apparent owner or other 2111 person entitled to the property is in a state that does not 2112 provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the 2113 property, or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not 2114 applicable to the property; and 2115 (b)âThe holder is domiciled in a jurisdiction a domiciliary 2116 of a state that does not have applicable provide by law for the 2117 escheat, abandoned, or custodial taking of the property, or its 2118 escheat or unclaimed property laws law is not applicable to the 2119 property. 2120 Section 38.âSection 717.1035, Florida Statutes, is 2121 repealed. 2122 Section 39.âSection 717.104, Florida Statutes, is amended 2123 to read: 2124 717.104âTravelerâs checks and money orders.â 2125 (1)âSubject to subsection (4), any sum payable on a 2126 travelerâs check that has been outstanding for more than 15 2127 years after its issuance is presumed abandoned unclaimed unless 2128 the apparent owner or authorized representative, within 15 2129 years, has demonstrated a continued interest in the property in 2130 accordance with s. 717.102 communicated in writing with the 2131 issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as 2132 evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the 2133 issuer. 2134 (2)âSubject to subsection (4), any sum payable on a money 2135 order or similar written instrument, other than a third party 2136 bank check, that has been outstanding for more than 7 years 2137 after its issuance is presumed abandoned unclaimed unless the 2138 apparent owner or authorized representative, within 7 years, has 2139 demonstrated a continued interest in the property in accordance 2140 with s. 717.102 communicated in writing with the issuer 2141 concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by 2142 a memorandum or other record on file with the issuer. 2143 (3)âA No holder may not deduct from the amount of any 2144 travelerâs check or money order any charges imposed by reason of 2145 the failure to present those instruments for payment unless 2146 there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the 2147 holder issuer and the apparent owner of the property pursuant to 2148 which the holder issuer may impose those charges and the holder 2149 issuer regularly imposes those charges and does not regularly 2150 reverse or otherwise cancel those charges with respect to the 2151 property. 2152 (4)âNo sum payable on a travelerâs check, money order, or 2153 similar written instrument, other than a third party bank check, 2154 described in subsections (1) and (2) may be subjected to the 2155 custody of this state as abandoned unclaimed property unless any 2156 of the following conditions are met: 2157 (a)âThe records of the holder issuer show that the 2158 travelerâs check, money order, or similar written instrument was 2159 purchased in this state.; 2160 (b)âThe holder issuer has its principal place of business 2161 in this state and its the records of the issuer do not show the 2162 state in which the travelerâs check, money order, or similar 2163 written instrument was purchased.; or 2164 (c)âThe holder issuer has its principal place of business 2165 in this state; the holderâs records of the issuer show the state 2166 in which the travelerâs check, money order, or similar written 2167 instrument was purchased; and the laws of the state of purchase 2168 does not provide applicable do not provide for the escheat, 2169 abandoned, or unclaimed property laws or custodial taking of the 2170 property, or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not 2171 applicable to the property. 2172 (5)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, 2173 subsection (4) applies to sums payable on travelerâs checks, 2174 money orders, and similar written instruments presumed abandoned 2175 unclaimed on or after February 1, 1965, except to the extent 2176 that those sums have been paid over to a state prior to January 2177 1, 1974. 2178 Section 40.âSection 717.1045, Florida Statutes, is amended 2179 to read: 2180 717.1045âGift certificates and similar credit items. 2181 Notwithstanding s. 717.117, an unredeemed gift certificate or 2182 credit memo as defined in s. 501.95 is not required to be 2183 reported as abandoned unclaimed property. 2184 (1)âThe consideration paid for an unredeemed gift 2185 certificate or credit memo is the property of the issuer of the 2186 unredeemed gift certificate or credit memo. 2187 (2)âAn unredeemed gift certificate or credit memo is 2188 subject only to any rights of a purchaser or owner thereof and 2189 is not subject to a claim made by any state acting on behalf of 2190 a purchaser or owner. 2191 (3)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that this section 2192 apply to the custodial holding of unredeemed gift certificates 2193 and credit memos. 2194 (4)âHowever, a gift certificate or credit memo described in 2195 s. 501.95(2)(b) shall be reported as abandoned unclaimed 2196 property. The consideration paid for such a gift certificate or 2197 credit memo is the property of the owner of the gift certificate 2198 or credit memo. 2199 Section 41.âSection 717.105, Florida Statutes, is amended 2200 to read: 2201 717.105âChecks, drafts, and similar instruments issued or 2202 certified by banking and financial organizations.â 2203 (1)âAny sum payable on a check, draft, or similar 2204 instrument, except those subject to ss. 717.104 and 717.115, on 2205 which a banking or financial organization is directly liable, 2206 including, but not limited to, a cashierâs check or a certified 2207 check, which has been outstanding for more than 5 years after it 2208 was payable or after its issuance if payable on demand, is 2209 presumed abandoned unclaimed unless the apparent owner or 2210 authorized representative, within 5 years, has communicated in 2211 writing with the banking or financial organization concerning it 2212 or otherwise demonstrated a continued interest in the property 2213 in accordance with s. 717.102 indicated an interest as evidenced 2214 by a memorandum or other record on file with the banking or 2215 financial organization. 2216 (2)âA No holder may not deduct from the amount of any 2217 instrument subject to this section any charges imposed by reason 2218 of the failure to present the instrument for encashment unless 2219 there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the 2220 holder and the apparent owner of the instrument pursuant to 2221 which the holder may impose those charges and does not regularly 2222 reverse or otherwise cancel those charges with respect to the 2223 instrument. 2224 Section 42.âSubsection (1), paragraphs (a) and (b) of 2225 subsection (3), and subsections (4) and (5) of section 717.106, 2226 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2227 717.106âBank deposits and funds in financial 2228 organizations.â 2229 (1)âAny demand, savings, or matured time deposit with a 2230 banking or financial organization, including deposits that are 2231 automatically renewable, and any funds paid toward the purchase 2232 of shares, a mutual investment certificate, or any other 2233 interest in a banking or financial organization is presumed 2234 abandoned unclaimed unless the apparent owner or authorized 2235 representative has, within 5 years, engaged in any of the 2236 following activities: 2237 (a)âIncreased or decreased the amount of the deposit or 2238 presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit 2239 for the crediting of interest.; 2240 (b)âCommunicated in writing or by documented telephone 2241 contact with the banking or financial organization concerning 2242 the property.; 2243 (c)âOtherwise demonstrated a continued indicated an 2244 interest in the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other 2245 record on file with the banking or financial organization.; 2246 (d)âOwned other property to which paragraph (a), paragraph 2247 (b), or paragraph (c) is applicable and if the banking or 2248 financial organization communicates in writing with the owner 2249 with regard to the property that would otherwise be presumed 2250 abandoned unclaimed under this subsection at the address to 2251 which communications regarding the other property regularly are 2252 sent.; or 2253 (e)âHad another relationship with the banking or financial 2254 organization concerning which the apparent owner has: 2255 1.âCommunicated in writing with the banking or financial 2256 organization; or 2257 2.âOtherwise demonstrated a continued indicated an interest 2258 as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the 2259 banking or financial organization and if the banking or 2260 financial organization communicates in writing with the apparent 2261 owner or authorized representative with regard to the property 2262 that would otherwise be presumed abandoned unclaimed under this 2263 subsection at the address to which communications regarding the 2264 other relationship regularly are sent. 2265 (3)âA No holder may not impose with respect to property 2266 described in subsection (1) any charges due to dormancy or 2267 inactivity or cease payment of interest unless: 2268 (a)âThere is an enforceable written contract between the 2269 holder and the apparent owner of the property pursuant to which 2270 the holder may impose those charges or cease payment of 2271 interest. 2272 (b)âFor property in excess of $2, the holder, no more than 2273 3 months prior to the initial imposition of those charges or 2274 cessation of interest, has given written notice to the apparent 2275 owner of the amount of those charges at the last known address 2276 of the apparent owner stating that those charges shall be 2277 imposed or that interest shall cease, but the notice provided in 2278 this section need not be given with respect to charges imposed 2279 or interest ceased before July 1, 1987. 2280 (4)âAny property described in subsection (1) that is 2281 automatically renewable is matured for purposes of subsection 2282 (1) upon the expiration of its initial time period except that, 2283 in the case of any renewal to which the apparent owner consents 2284 at or about the time of renewal by communicating in writing with 2285 the banking or financial organization or otherwise indicating 2286 consent as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file 2287 prepared by an employee of the organization, the property is 2288 matured upon the expiration of the last time period for which 2289 consent was given. If, at the time provided for delivery in s. 2290 717.119, a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest 2291 would result from the delivery of the property, the time for 2292 delivery is extended until the time when no penalty or 2293 forfeiture would result. 2294 (5)âIf the documents establishing a deposit described in 2295 subsection (1) state the address of a beneficiary of the 2296 deposit, and the account has a value of at least $50, notice 2297 shall be given to the beneficiary as provided for notice to the 2298 apparent owner under s. 717.117 s. 717.117(6). This subsection 2299 shall apply to accounts opened on or after October 1, 1990. 2300 Section 43.âSubsection (1) of section 717.1065, Florida 2301 Statutes, is amended to read: 2302 717.1065âVirtual currency.â 2303 (1)âAny virtual currency held or owing by a banking 2304 organization, corporation, custodian, exchange, or other entity 2305 engaged in virtual currency business activity is presumed 2306 unclaimed unless the owner, within 7 5 years, has communicated 2307 in writing with the banking organization, corporation, 2308 custodian, exchange, or other entity engaged in virtual currency 2309 business activity concerning the virtual currency or otherwise 2310 indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other 2311 record on file with the banking organization, corporation, 2312 custodian, exchange, or other entity engaged in virtual currency 2313 business activity. 2314 Section 44.âSubsection (1) of section 717.107, Florida 2315 Statutes, is amended to read: 2316 717.107âFunds owing under life insurance policies, annuity 2317 contracts, and retained asset accounts; fines, penalties, and 2318 interest; United States Social Security Administration Death 2319 Master File.â 2320 (1)âFunds held or owing under any life or endowment 2321 insurance policy or annuity contract which has matured or 2322 terminated are presumed abandoned unclaimed if unclaimed for 2323 more than 5 years after the date of death of the insured, the 2324 annuitant, or the retained asset account holder, but property 2325 described in paragraph (3)(d) is presumed abandoned unclaimed if 2326 such property is not claimed for more than 2 years. The amount 2327 presumed abandoned unclaimed shall include any amount due and 2328 payable under s. 627.4615. 2329 Section 45.âSection 717.1071, Florida Statutes, is amended 2330 to read: 2331 717.1071âLost owners of abandoned unclaimed 2332 demutualization, rehabilitation, or related reorganization 2333 proceeds.â 2334 (1)âProperty distributable in the course of a 2335 demutualization, rehabilitation, or related reorganization of an 2336 insurance company is deemed abandoned 2 years after the date the 2337 property is first distributable if, at the time of the first 2338 distribution, the last known address of the apparent owner on 2339 the books and records of the holder is known to be incorrect or 2340 the distribution or statements are returned by the post office 2341 as undeliverable; and the apparent owner or authorized 2342 representative owner has not communicated in writing with the 2343 holder or its agent regarding the interest or otherwise 2344 communicated with the holder regarding the interest as evidenced 2345 by a memorandum or other record on file with the holder or its 2346 agent. 2347 (2)âProperty distributable in the course of 2348 demutualization, rehabilitation, or related reorganization of a 2349 mutual insurance company that is not subject to subsection (1) 2350 shall be reportable as otherwise provided by this chapter. 2351 (3)âProperty subject to this section shall be reported and 2352 delivered no later than May 1 as of the preceding December 31; 2353 however, the initial report under this section shall be filed no 2354 later than November 1, 2003, as of December 31, 2002. 2355 Section 46.âSection 717.108, Florida Statutes, is amended 2356 to read: 2357 717.108âDeposits held by utilities.âAny deposit, including 2358 any interest thereon, made by a subscriber with a utility to 2359 secure payment or any sum paid in advance for utility services 2360 to be furnished, less any lawful charges, that remains unclaimed 2361 by the apparent owner for more than 1 year after termination of 2362 the services for which the deposit or advance payment was made 2363 is presumed abandoned unclaimed. 2364 Section 47.âSection 717.109, Florida Statutes, is amended 2365 to read: 2366 717.109âRefunds held by business associations.âExcept as 2367 otherwise provided by law, any sum that a business association 2368 has been ordered to refund by a court or administrative agency 2369 which has been unclaimed by the apparent owner for more than 1 2370 year after it became payable in accordance with the final 2371 determination or order providing for the refund, regardless of 2372 whether the final determination or order requires any person 2373 entitled to a refund to make a claim for it, is presumed 2374 abandoned unclaimed. 2375 Section 48.âSection 717.1101, Florida Statutes, is amended 2376 to read: 2377 717.1101âAbandoned Unclaimed equity and debt of business 2378 associations.â 2379 (1)(a)âStock, or other equity interests, or debt of 2380 interest in a business association is presumed abandoned 2381 unclaimed on the date of the earliest of any of the following: 2382 1.âThree years after the date a communication, other than 2383 communications required by s. 717.117, sent by the holder by 2384 first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned 2385 to the holder undelivered by the United States Postal Service. 2386 If such returned communication is resent within 1 month to the 2387 apparent owner, the 3-year dormancy period does not begin until 2388 the day the resent item is returned as undelivered. 2389 2.âFive Three years after the most recent of any account 2390 owner-generated activity or communication initiated by the 2391 apparent owner or authorized representative which demonstrates 2392 continued interest in the related to the account, as recorded 2393 and maintained by in the holder. Routine automatic reinvestments 2394 or other routine transactions previously authorized by the 2395 apparent owner or authorized representative do not prevent, 2396 interrupt, or reset the dormancy period and do not constitute an 2397 affirmative demonstration of continued interest. holderâs 2398 database and records systems sufficient enough to demonstrate 2399 the ownerâs continued awareness or interest in the property; 2400 3.2.âTwo Three years after the date of the death of the 2401 apparent owner, as evidenced by: 2402 a.âNotice to the holder of the apparent ownerâs death by an 2403 authorized representative administrator, beneficiary, relative, 2404 or trustee, or by a personal representative or other legal 2405 representative of the ownerâs estate; 2406 b.âReceipt by the holder of a copy of the death certificate 2407 of the apparent owner; 2408 c.âConfirmation by the holder of the apparent ownerâs death 2409 through though other means; or 2410 d.âOther evidence from which the holder may reasonably 2411 conclude that the apparent owner is deceased.; or 2412 3.âOne year after the date on which the holder receives 2413 notice under subparagraph 2. if the notice is received 2 years 2414 or less after the ownerâs death and the holder lacked knowledge 2415 of the ownerâs death during that period of 2 years or less. 2416 (b)âIf the holder does not send communication to the 2417 apparent owner of a security by first-class United States mail 2418 on an annual basis, the holder must attempt to confirm the 2419 apparent ownerâs interest in the equity interest by sending the 2420 apparent owner an e-mail communication not later than 3 years 2421 after the apparent ownerâs or authorized representativeâs last 2422 demonstration of continued interest in the equity interest. 2423 However, the holder must promptly attempt to contact the 2424 apparent owner by first-class United States mail if: 2425 1.âThe holder does not have information needed to send the 2426 apparent owner an e-mail communication or the holder believes 2427 that the apparent ownerâs e-mail address in the holderâs records 2428 is not valid; 2429 2.âThe holder received notification that the e-mail 2430 communication was not received; or 2431 3.âThe apparent owner does not respond to the e-mail 2432 communication within 30 days after the communication was sent. 2433 (c)âIf first-class United States mail sent under paragraph 2434 (b) is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States 2435 Postal Service, the equity interest is presumed abandoned in 2436 accordance with paragraph (a). 2437 (d)âUnmatured or unredeemed debt, other than a bearer bond 2438 or an original issue discount bond, is presumed abandoned 5 2439 unclaimed 3 years after the date of the most recent interest 2440 payment unclaimed by the owner. 2441 (e)(c)âMatured or redeemed debt is presumed abandoned 5 2442 unclaimed 3 years after the date of maturity or redemption. 2443 (f)(d)âAt the time property is presumed abandoned unclaimed 2444 under paragraph (a) or paragraph (b), any other property right 2445 accrued or accruing to the owner as a result of the property 2446 interest and not previously presumed abandoned unclaimed is also 2447 presumed abandoned unclaimed. 2448 (2)âThe running of the applicable dormancy period under 2449 this section such 3-year period ceases if the apparent owner or 2450 authorized representative demonstrates continued interest under 2451 s. 717.102, including by any of the following actions person: 2452 (a)1.âCommunicating Communicates in writing or by other 2453 means with the association or its agent regarding the interest, 2454 or a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable as a result of 2455 the interest, as recorded by the association or its agent; or 2456 2.âOtherwise communicates with the association regarding 2457 the interest or a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable 2458 as a result of the interest, as evidenced by a memorandum or 2459 other record on file with the association or its agent. 2460 (b)âPresenting Presents an instrument issued to pay 2461 interest, or a dividend, or other cash distribution. If any 2462 future dividend, distribution, or other sum payable to the owner 2463 as a result of the interest is subsequently unclaimed not 2464 claimed by the owner, a new period in which the property is 2465 presumed abandoned unclaimed commences and relates back only to 2466 the time a subsequent dividend, distribution, or other sum 2467 became due and payable. 2468 (3)âAt the same time any interest is presumed abandoned 2469 unclaimed under this section, any dividend, distribution, or 2470 other sum then held for or owing to the owner as a result of the 2471 interest, is presumed abandoned unclaimed. 2472 (4)âAny dividend, profit, distribution, interest 2473 redemption, payment on principal, or other sum held or owing by 2474 a business association for or to a shareholder, 2475 certificateholder, member, bondholder, or other security holder, 2476 who has not claimed such amount or corresponded in writing with 2477 the business association concerning such amount, within 5 3 2478 years after the date prescribed for payment or delivery, is 2479 presumed abandoned unclaimed. 2480 (5)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section, 2481 equity interests in business associations and securities 2482 accounts are not presumed abandoned solely due to inactivity if 2483 the holder knows the location of the apparent owner. 2484 (a)âFor purposes of this subsection, a holder must perform 2485 data matching of owner records maintained in its database 2486 against commercially available third-party data comparison 2487 sources to identify updated owner address information and 2488 indicators of deceased status. Utilizing any updated 2489 information, together with existing information of record, the 2490 holder is deemed to know the location of the apparent owner if: 2491 1.âThe holder communicates with the apparent owner at least 2492 annually by first-class United States mail or electronic means, 2493 including, but not limited to, e-mail, text message, mobile 2494 application, or similar mechanism; 2495 2.âSuch communication is successfully delivered, meaning 2496 not returned as undeliverable; and 2497 3.âOne or more additional account-level indicators 2498 demonstrating an owner indication of interest occur at least 2499 once every 10 years, including: 2500 a.âOwner-initiated activity, such as authenticated access 2501 to a website, mobile engagement via mobile messaging, or other 2502 authenticated third-party account servicing software; 2503 b.âUpdated contact information received through an 2504 authorized financial adviser; 2505 c.âResponses to account notifications or alerts; 2506 d.âNegotiation of distributions, including dividends; or 2507 e.âAny other action by the apparent owner or authorized 2508 representative which reasonably demonstrates to the holder that 2509 the apparent owner or authorized representative is aware of and 2510 maintains an interest in the property. 2511 (b)âAutomatic deposits, reinvestments, or other recurring 2512 transactions initiated by the holder may not independently 2513 constitute an indication of apparent owner interest for purposes 2514 of this section. 2515 (c)âIf the conditions in paragraph (a) are not satisfied 2516 and the ownerâs location is deemed unknown, the equity interest 2517 or securities account may be presumed abandoned: 2518 1.âTen years after the ownerâs most recent indication of 2519 interest in the property; or 2520 2.âTen years after the date a communication is returned as 2521 undeliverable, unless the owner responds to a due diligence 2522 notice before the reporting deadline. 2523 (d)âProperty described in paragraph (c) is presumed 2524 abandoned only after reasonable efforts to locate the owner have 2525 been unsuccessful and the holder has complied with the due 2526 diligence requirement of this chapter. 2527 (e)âThis subsection applies to equity interests and 2528 securities accounts held directly by the owner or indirectly 2529 through a brokerage account or similar account. 2530 Section 49.âSection 717.111, Florida Statutes, is amended 2531 to read: 2532 717.111âProperty of business associations held in course of 2533 dissolution.âAll intangible property distributable in the course 2534 of a voluntary or involuntary dissolution of a business 2535 association which is not claimed by the apparent owner for more 2536 than 6 months after the date specified for final distribution is 2537 presumed abandoned unclaimed. 2538 Section 50.âSubsections (1) and (5) of section 717.112, 2539 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2540 717.112âProperty held by agents and fiduciaries.â 2541 (1)âAll intangible property and any income or increment 2542 thereon held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another 2543 person, including property held by an attorney in fact or an 2544 agent, except as provided in ss. 717.1125 and 733.816, is 2545 presumed abandoned unclaimed unless the apparent owner has 2546 within 5 years after it has become payable or distributable 2547 increased or decreased the principal, accepted payment of 2548 principal or income, communicated in writing concerning the 2549 property, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a 2550 memorandum or other record on file with the fiduciary. 2551 (5)âAll intangible property, and any income or increment 2552 thereon, issued by a government or governmental subdivision or 2553 agency, public corporation, or public authority and held in an 2554 agency capacity for the governmental subdivision, agency, public 2555 corporation, or public authority for the benefit of the owner of 2556 record, is presumed abandoned unclaimed unless the apparent 2557 owner has, within 1 year after such property has become payable 2558 or distributable, increased or decreased the principal, accepted 2559 payment of the principal or income, communicated concerning the 2560 property, or otherwise indicated an interest in the property as 2561 evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the 2562 fiduciary. 2563 Section 51.âSection 717.1125, Florida Statutes, is amended 2564 to read: 2565 717.1125âProperty held by fiduciaries under trust 2566 instruments.âAll intangible property and any income or increment 2567 thereon held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another 2568 person under a trust instrument is presumed abandoned unclaimed 2569 unless the apparent owner has, within 2 years after it has 2570 become payable or distributable, increased or decreased the 2571 principal, accepted payment of principal or income, communicated 2572 concerning the property, or otherwise indicated an interest as 2573 evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the 2574 fiduciary. This section does not relieve a fiduciary of his or 2575 her duties under the Florida Trust Code. 2576 Section 52.âSection 717.113, Florida Statutes, is amended 2577 to read: 2578 717.113âProperty held by courts and public agencies.âAll 2579 intangible property held for the apparent owner by any court, 2580 government or governmental subdivision or agency, public 2581 corporation, or public authority that has not been claimed by 2582 the apparent owner for more than 1 year after it became payable 2583 or distributable is presumed abandoned unclaimed. Except as 2584 provided in s. 45.032(3)(c), money held in the court registry 2585 and for which no court order has been issued to determine an 2586 owner does not become payable or distributable and is not 2587 subject to reporting under this chapter. Notwithstanding the 2588 provisions of this section, funds deposited in the Minerals 2589 Trust Fund pursuant to s. 377.247 are presumed abandoned 2590 unclaimed only if the funds have not been claimed by the 2591 apparent owner for more than 5 years after the date of first 2592 production from the well. 2593 Section 53.âSection 717.115, Florida Statutes, is amended 2594 to read: 2595 717.115âWages.âUnpaid wages, including wages represented by 2596 unpresented payroll checks, owing in the ordinary course of the 2597 holderâs business that have not been claimed by the apparent 2598 owner for more than 1 year after becoming payable are presumed 2599 abandoned unclaimed. 2600 Section 54.âSection 717.116, Florida Statutes, is amended 2601 to read: 2602 717.116âContents of safe-deposit box or other safekeeping 2603 repository.âAll tangible and intangible property held by a 2604 banking or financial organization in a safe-deposit box or any 2605 other safekeeping repository in this state in the ordinary 2606 course of the holderâs business, and proceeds resulting from the 2607 sale of the property permitted by law, that has not been claimed 2608 by the apparent owner or authorized representative for more than 2609 3 years after the lease or rental period on the box or other 2610 repository has expired are presumed abandoned unclaimed. 2611 Section 55.âSection 717.117, Florida Statutes, is amended 2612 to read: 2613 717.117âHolder due diligence and report of abandoned 2614 unclaimed property.â 2615 (1)âProperty is presumed abandoned upon expiration of the 2616 applicable dormancy period under this chapter. However, such 2617 property is not deemed abandoned for purposes of reporting or 2618 remittance to the department until the holder has conducted 2619 reasonable due diligence as required by this section, resulting 2620 in no indication of interest from the apparent owner or 2621 authorized representative. 2622 (2)âHolders of property presumed abandoned which has a 2623 value of $50 or more shall use due diligence to locate and 2624 notify the apparent owner that the holder is in possession of 2625 property subject to this chapter. At least 90 days, but not more 2626 than 180 days, before filing the report required by this 2627 section, a holder in possession of presumed abandoned property 2628 shall send written notice by first-class United States mail to 2629 the apparent ownerâs last known address as shown in the holderâs 2630 records or from other available sources, or by e-mail if the 2631 apparent owner has elected for e-mail delivery, informing the 2632 apparent owner that the holder is in possession of property 2633 subject to this chapter, provided that the holderâs records 2634 contain a mailing or e-mail address for the apparent owner which 2635 is not known by the holder to be inaccurate. The holder may 2636 provide notice by mail, by e-mail, or by both methods. If the 2637 holderâs records indicate that the mailing address is 2638 inaccurate, notice may be provided by e-mail if the apparent 2639 owner has elected e-mail delivery. 2640 (3)âIf the value of the property is greater than $1,000, 2641 the holder must send a second written notice by certified United 2642 States mail, return receipt requested, to the apparent ownerâs 2643 last known address at least 60 days before filing the report 2644 required by this section, if the holderâs records contain a 2645 mailing address for the apparent owner which is not known by the 2646 holder to be inaccurate. Reasonable costs paid to the United 2647 States Postal Service for certified mail, return receipt 2648 requested, may be deducted from the property as a service 2649 charge. A signed return receipt received in response to the 2650 certified mail notice constitutes an affirmative demonstration 2651 of continued interest as described in s. 717.102. 2652 (4)âThe written notice required under this section must 2653 include: 2654 (a)âA heading that reads substantially as follows: âNotice: 2655 The State of Florida requires us to notify you that your 2656 property may be transferred to the custody of the Florida 2657 Department of Financial Services if you do not contact us before 2658 ...(insert date that is at least 30 days after the date of 2659 notice)....â 2660 (b)âA description of the type, nature, and, unless the 2661 property does not have a fixed value, value of the property that 2662 is the subject of the notice. 2663 (c)âA statement that the property will be turned over to 2664 the custody of the department as abandoned property if no 2665 response is received. 2666 (d)âA statement that noncash property will be sold or 2667 liquidated by the department. 2668 (e)âA statement that, after the property is remitted to the 2669 department, a claim must be filed with the department to recover 2670 the property. 2671 (f)âA statement that the property is currently in the 2672 custody of the holder and that the apparent owner may prevent 2673 transfer of the property by contacting the holder before the 2674 deadline stated in the notice. 2675 (g)âIf the property is virtual currency, a statement that 2676 the virtual currency will be liquidated by the holder before it 2677 is remitted to the department and that only the proceeds of the 2678 liquidation will be transferred. 2679 (5)âEvery holder of abandoned person holding funds or other 2680 property, tangible or intangible, presumed unclaimed and subject 2681 to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter shall submit 2682 a report to the department via electronic medium as the 2683 department may prescribe by rule. The report must include: 2684 (a)âExcept for travelerâs checks and money orders, the 2685 name, social security number or taxpayer identification number, 2686 date of birth, if known, and last known address, if any, of each 2687 apparent person appearing from the records of the holder to be 2688 the owner of any property which is abandoned presumed unclaimed 2689 and which has a value of $10 or more. 2690 (b)âFor abandoned unclaimed funds that have a value of $10 2691 or more held or owing under any life or endowment insurance 2692 policy or annuity contract, the identifying information provided 2693 in paragraph (a) for both the insured or annuitant and the 2694 beneficiary according to records of the insurance company 2695 holding or owing the funds. 2696 (c)âFor all tangible property held in a safe-deposit box or 2697 other safekeeping repository, a description of the property and 2698 the place where the property is held and may be inspected by the 2699 department, and any amounts owing to the holder. Contents of a 2700 safe-deposit box or other safekeeping repository which consist 2701 of documents or writings of a private nature and which have 2702 little or no commercial value may apparent value shall not be 2703 reported as abandoned property presumed unclaimed. 2704 (d)âThe nature or type of property, any accounting or 2705 identifying number associated with the property, a description 2706 of the property, and the amount appearing from the records to be 2707 due. Items of value of less than $10 each may be reported in the 2708 aggregate. 2709 (e)âThe date the property became payable, demandable, or 2710 returnable, and the date of the last transaction with the 2711 apparent owner with respect to the property. 2712 (f)âAny other information the department may prescribe by 2713 rule as necessary for the administration of this chapter. 2714 (6)(2)âIf the total value of all abandoned presumed 2715 unclaimed property, whether tangible or intangible, held by a 2716 person is less than $10, a zero balance report may be filed for 2717 that reporting period. 2718 (7)(3)âCredit balances, customer overpayments, security 2719 deposits, and refunds having a value of less than $10 may not be 2720 reported as abandoned property shall not be presumed unclaimed. 2721 (8)âA security identified by the holder as non-freely 2722 transferable or worthless may not be included in a report filed 2723 under this section. If the holder determines that a security is 2724 no longer non-freely transferable or worthless, the holder must 2725 report and deliver the security on the next regular report date 2726 prescribed for delivery of securities by the holder under this 2727 chapter. 2728 (9)(4)âIf the holder of abandoned property presumed 2729 unclaimed and subject to custody under this chapter as unclaimed 2730 property is a successor holder or if the holder has changed the 2731 holderâs name while in possession of the property, the holder 2732 must shall file with the holderâs report all known names and 2733 addresses of each prior holder of the property. Compliance with 2734 this subsection means the holder exercises reasonable and 2735 prudent efforts to determine the names of all prior holders. 2736 (10)âThe report must be signed by or on behalf of the 2737 holder and verified as to its completeness and accuracy, and the 2738 holder must state that it has complied with the due diligence 2739 requirements of this section. 2740 (11)(5)âThe report must be filed before May 1 of each year. 2741 The report applies to the preceding calendar year. Upon written 2742 request by any person required to file a report, and upon a 2743 showing of good cause, the department may extend the reporting 2744 date. The department may impose and collect a penalty of $10 per 2745 day up to a maximum of $500 for the failure to timely report, if 2746 an extension was not provided or if the holder of the property 2747 failed to include in a report information required by this 2748 chapter which was in the holderâs possession at the time of 2749 reporting. The penalty shall be remitted to the department 2750 within 30 days after the date of the notification to the holder 2751 that the penalty is due and owing. As necessary for proper 2752 administration of this chapter, the department may waive any 2753 penalty due with appropriate justification. The department must 2754 provide information contained in a report filed with the 2755 department to any person requesting a copy of the report or 2756 information contained in a report, to the extent the information 2757 requested is not confidential, within 45 days after the 2758 department determines that the report is accurate and acceptable 2759 and that the reported property is the same as the remitted 2760 property. 2761 (6)âHolders of inactive accounts having a value of $50 or 2762 more shall use due diligence to locate and notify apparent 2763 owners that the entity is holding unclaimed property available 2764 for them to recover. Not more than 120 days and not less than 60 2765 days prior to filing the report required by this section, the 2766 holder in possession of property presumed unclaimed and subject 2767 to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter shall send 2768 written notice by first-class United States mail to the apparent 2769 owner at the apparent ownerâs last known address from the 2770 holderâs records or from other available sources, or via 2771 electronic mail if the apparent owner has elected this method of 2772 delivery, informing the apparent owner that the holder is in 2773 possession of property subject to this chapter, if the holder 2774 has in its records a mailing or electronic address for the 2775 apparent owner which the holderâs records do not disclose to be 2776 inaccurate. These two means of contact are not mutually 2777 exclusive; if the mailing address is determined to be 2778 inaccurate, electronic mail may be used if so elected by the 2779 apparent owner. 2780 (7)âThe written notice to the apparent owner required under 2781 this section must: 2782 (a)âContain a heading that reads substantially as follows: 2783 âNotice. The State of Florida requires us to notify you that 2784 your property may be transferred to the custody of the Florida 2785 Department of Financial Services if you do not contact us before 2786 ...(insert date that is at least 30 days after the date of 2787 notice)....â 2788 (b)âIdentify the type, nature, and, except for property 2789 that does not have a fixed value, value of the property that is 2790 the subject of the notice. 2791 (c)âState that the property will be turned over to the 2792 custody of the department as unclaimed property if no response 2793 to this letter is received. 2794 (d)âState that any property that is not legal tender of the 2795 United States may be sold or liquidated by the department. 2796 (e)âState that after the property is turned over to the 2797 department, an apparent owner seeking return of the property may 2798 file a claim with the department. 2799 (f)âState that the property is currently with a holder and 2800 provide instructions that the apparent owner must follow to 2801 prevent the holder from reporting and paying for the property or 2802 from delivering the property to the department. 2803 (12)(8)âAny holder of intangible property may file with the 2804 department a petition for determination that the property is 2805 abandoned and unclaimed requesting the department to accept 2806 custody of the property. The petition shall state any special 2807 circumstances that exist, contain the information required by 2808 subsection (9) subsection (4), and show that a diligent search 2809 has been made to locate the apparent owner. If the department 2810 finds that the proof of diligent search is satisfactory, it 2811 shall give notice as provided in s. 717.118 and accept custody 2812 of the property. 2813 (13)(9)âUpon written request by any entity or person 2814 required to file a report, stating such entityâs or personâs 2815 justification for such action, the department may place that 2816 entity or person in an inactive status as an abandoned unclaimed 2817 property âholder.â 2818 (14)(10)(a)âThis section does not apply to the abandoned 2819 unclaimed patronage refunds as provided for by contract or 2820 through bylaw provisions of entities organized under chapter 425 2821 or that are exempt from ad valorem taxation pursuant to s. 2822 196.2002. 2823 (b)âThis section does not apply to intangible property 2824 held, issued, or owing by a business association subject to the 2825 jurisdiction of the United States Surface Transportation Board 2826 or its successor federal agency if the apparent owner of such 2827 intangible property is a business association. The holder of 2828 such property does not have any obligation to report, to pay, or 2829 to deliver such property to the department. 2830 (c)âThis section does not apply to credit balances, 2831 overpayments, refunds, or outstanding checks owed by a health 2832 care provider to a managed care payor with whom the health care 2833 provider has a managed care contract, provided that the credit 2834 balances, overpayments, refunds, or outstanding checks become 2835 due and owing pursuant to the managed care contract. 2836 (15)(11)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âproperty 2837 identifierâ means the descriptor used by the holder to identify 2838 the abandoned unclaimed property. 2839 (b)âSocial security numbers and property identifiers 2840 contained in reports required under this section, held by the 2841 department, are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 2842 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 2843 (c)âThis exemption applies to social security numbers and 2844 property identifiers held by the department before, on, or after 2845 the effective date of this exemption. 2846 Section 56.âSection 717.118, Florida Statutes, is amended 2847 to read: 2848 717.118âNotification of apparent owners of abandoned 2849 unclaimed property.â 2850 (1)âIt is specifically recognized that the state has an 2851 obligation to make an effort to notify apparent owners in a 2852 cost-effective manner that their abandoned property has been 2853 reported and remitted to the department of unclaimed property in 2854 a cost-effective manner. In order to provide all the citizens of 2855 this state an effective and efficient program for the recovery 2856 of abandoned personal unclaimed property, the department shall 2857 use cost-effective means to make at least one active attempt to 2858 notify apparent owners of abandoned unclaimed property accounts 2859 valued at $50 or more, abandoned tangible property, and 2860 abandoned shares of stock for which more than $250 with a 2861 reported address or taxpayer identification number is available. 2862 Such active attempt to notify apparent owners shall include any 2863 attempt by the department to directly contact the apparent 2864 owner. Other means of notification, such as publication of the 2865 names of apparent owners in the newspaper, on television, on the 2866 Internet, or through other promotional efforts and items in 2867 which the department does not directly attempt to contact the 2868 apparent owner are expressly declared to be passive attempts. 2869 Nothing in This subsection does not preclude precludes other 2870 agencies or entities of state government from notifying owners 2871 of the existence of abandoned unclaimed property or attempting 2872 to notify apparent owners of abandoned unclaimed property. 2873 (2)âNotification provided directly to individual apparent 2874 owners shall contain consist of a description of the abandoned 2875 property and information regarding recovery of the unclaimed 2876 property from the department. The form and content of the 2877 departmentâs notice must be tailored to the type of property 2878 reported and must include any information necessary to 2879 reasonably inform the apparent owner of the consequences of 2880 failure to claim the property, including potential sale or 2881 disposition under s. 717.122. 2882 (3)âThe department shall maintain a publicly accessible, 2883 electronically searchable website that includes the names of 2884 apparent owners of abandoned property reported to the department 2885 and instructions for filing a claim. The website must list 2886 property valued at $10 or more and provide instructions for 2887 filing a claim. Abandoned property valued at less than $10 2888 remains recoverable from the department in accordance with this 2889 chapter. 2890 (4)âThis section is not applicable to abandoned sums 2891 payable on travelerâs checks, money orders, and other written 2892 instruments presumed unclaimed under s. 717.104, or any other 2893 abandoned property reported without the necessary identifying 2894 information to establish ownership. 2895 Section 57.âSection 717.119, Florida Statutes, is amended 2896 to read: 2897 717.119âPayment or delivery of abandoned unclaimed 2898 property.â 2899 (1)âEvery person who is required to file a report under s. 2900 717.117 shall simultaneously pay or deliver to the department 2901 all abandoned unclaimed property required to be reported. Such 2902 payment or delivery shall accompany the report as required in 2903 this chapter for the preceding calendar year. 2904 (2)âPayment of abandoned unclaimed funds may be made to the 2905 department by electronic funds transfer. 2906 (3)âIf the apparent owner establishes the right to receive 2907 the abandoned unclaimed property to the satisfaction of the 2908 holder before the property has been delivered to the department 2909 or it appears that for some other reason the presumption that 2910 the property was erroneously classified as abandoned is 2911 unclaimed is erroneous, the holder need not pay or deliver the 2912 property to the department. In lieu of delivery, the holder 2913 shall file a verified written explanation of the proof of claim 2914 or of the error in classification of the presumption that the 2915 property as abandoned was unclaimed. 2916 (4)âAll virtual currency reported under this chapter on the 2917 annual report filing required in s. 717.117 shall be remitted to 2918 the department with the report. The holder shall liquidate the 2919 virtual currency and remit the proceeds to the department. The 2920 liquidation must occur within 30 days before the filing of the 2921 report. Upon delivery of the virtual currency proceeds to the 2922 department, the holder is relieved of all liability of every 2923 kind in accordance with the provisions of s. 717.1201 to every 2924 person for any losses or damages resulting to the person by the 2925 delivery to the department of the virtual currency proceeds. 2926 (5)âAll stock or other intangible ownership interest 2927 reported under this chapter on the annual report filing required 2928 in s. 717.117 shall be remitted to the department with the 2929 report. Upon delivery of the stock or other intangible ownership 2930 interest to the department, the holder and any transfer agent, 2931 registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder 2932 is relieved of all liability of every kind in accordance with 2933 the provisions of s. 717.1201 to every person for any losses or 2934 damages resulting to the person by the delivery to the 2935 department of the stock or other intangible ownership interest. 2936 (6)âAll intangible and tangible property held in a safe 2937 deposit box or any other safekeeping repository reported under 2938 s. 717.117 shall not be delivered to the department until 120 2939 days after the report due date. The delivery of the property, 2940 through the United States mail or any other carrier, shall be 2941 insured by the holder at an amount equal to the estimated value 2942 of the property. Each package shall be clearly marked on the 2943 outside âDeliver Unopened.â A holderâs safe-deposit box contents 2944 shall be delivered to the department in a single shipment. In 2945 lieu of a single shipment, holders may provide the department 2946 with a single detailed shipping schedule that includes package 2947 tracking information for all packages being sent pursuant to 2948 this section. 2949 (a)âHolders may remit the value of cash and coins found in 2950 abandoned unclaimed safe-deposit boxes to the department by 2951 cashierâs check or by electronic funds transfer, unless the cash 2952 or coins have a value above face value. The department shall 2953 identify by rule those cash and coin items having a numismatic 2954 value. Cash and coin items identified as having a numismatic 2955 value shall be remitted to the department in their original 2956 form. 2957 (b)âAny firearm or ammunition found in an abandoned 2958 unclaimed safe-deposit box or any other safekeeping repository 2959 shall be delivered by the holder to a law enforcement agency for 2960 property handling or disposal pursuant to s. 705.103(2)(b). If 2961 the firearm is sold by the law enforcement agency, with the 2962 balance of the proceeds must be deposited into the State School 2963 Fund if the firearm is sold. However, The department is 2964 authorized to make a reasonable attempt to ascertain the 2965 historical value to collectors of any firearm that has been 2966 delivered to the department. Any firearm appearing to have 2967 historical value to collectors may be sold by the department 2968 pursuant to s. 717.122 to a person having a federal firearms 2969 license. Any firearm which is not sold pursuant to s. 717.122 2970 shall be delivered by the department to a law enforcement agency 2971 in this state for proper handling or disposal. In accordance 2972 with pursuant to s. 705.103(2)(b), if the firearm is sold by the 2973 law enforcement agency, with the balance of the proceeds must be 2974 deposited into the State School Fund if the firearm is sold. The 2975 department is shall not be administratively, civilly, or 2976 criminally liable for any firearm delivered by the department to 2977 a law enforcement agency in this state for disposal. 2978 (c)âIf such property is not paid or delivered to the 2979 department on or before the applicable payment or delivery date, 2980 the holder shall pay to the department a penalty for each safe 2981 deposit box shipment received late. The penalty shall be $100 2982 for a safe-deposit box shipment container that is late 30 days 2983 or less. Thereafter, the penalty shall be $500 for a safe 2984 deposit box shipment container that is late for each additional 2985 successive 30-day period. The penalty assessed against a holder 2986 for a late safe-deposit box shipment container may shall not 2987 exceed $4,000 annually. The penalty shall be remitted to the 2988 department within 30 days after the date of the notification to 2989 the holder that the penalty is due and owing. 2990 (d)âThe department may waive any penalty due with 2991 appropriate justification, as provided by rule. 2992 (e)âIf a will or trust instrument is included among the 2993 contents of an abandoned a safe-deposit box or other safekeeping 2994 repository delivered to the department, the department must 2995 provide a copy of the will, trust, and any codicils or 2996 amendments to such will or trust instrument, upon request, to 2997 anyone who provides the department with a certified copy of the 2998 death certificate or another government-certified record 2999 evidencing evidence of the death of the testator or settlor. 3000 (7)âAny holder may request an extension in writing of up to 3001 60 days for the delivery of property if extenuating 3002 circumstances exist for the late delivery of the property. Any 3003 such extension the department may grant shall be in writing. 3004 (8)âA holder may not assign or otherwise transfer its 3005 obligation to report, pay, or deliver property or to comply with 3006 the provisions of this chapter, other than to a parent, 3007 subsidiary, or affiliate of the holder. 3008 (a)âUnless otherwise agreed to by the parties to a 3009 transaction, the holderâs successor by merger or consolidation, 3010 or any person or entity that acquires all or substantially all 3011 of the holderâs capital stock or assets, is responsible for 3012 fulfilling the holderâs obligation to report, pay, or deliver 3013 property or to comply with the duties of this chapter regarding 3014 the transfer of property owed to the holderâs successor and 3015 being held for an owner resulting from the merger, 3016 consolidation, or acquisition. 3017 (b)âThis subsection does not prohibit a holder from 3018 contracting with a third party for the reporting of abandoned 3019 unclaimed property, but the holder remains responsible to the 3020 department for the complete, accurate, and timely reporting of 3021 the property. 3022 Section 58.âSubsections (1), (2), and (4) of section 3023 717.1201, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3024 717.1201âCustody by state; holder liability; reimbursement 3025 of holder paying claim; reclaiming for owner; payment of safe 3026 deposit box or repository charges.â 3027 (1)âUpon the good faith payment or delivery of abandoned 3028 unclaimed property to the department, the state assumes custody 3029 and responsibility for the safekeeping of the property. Any 3030 person who pays or delivers abandoned unclaimed property to the 3031 department in good faith is relieved of all liability to the 3032 extent of the value of the property paid or delivered for any 3033 claim then existing or which thereafter may arise or be made 3034 with in respect to the property. 3035 (a)âA holderâs substantial compliance with the due 3036 diligence provisions in s. 717.117 s. 717.117(6) and good faith 3037 payment or delivery of abandoned unclaimed property to the 3038 department releases the holder from liability that may arise 3039 from such payment or delivery, and such delivery and payment may 3040 be pleaded as a defense in any suit or action brought by reason 3041 of such delivery or payment. This section does not relieve a 3042 fiduciary of his or her duties under the Florida Trust Code or 3043 Florida Probate Code. 3044 (b)âIf the holder pays or delivers property to the 3045 department in good faith and thereafter any other person claims 3046 the property from the holder paying or delivering, or another 3047 state claims the money or property under that stateâs laws 3048 relating to escheat or abandoned or unclaimed property, the 3049 department, upon written notice of the claim, shall defend the 3050 holder against the claim and indemnify the holder against any 3051 liability on the claim, except that a holder may not be 3052 indemnified against penalties imposed by another state. 3053 (2)âFor the purposes of this section, a payment or delivery 3054 of abandoned unclaimed property is made in good faith if: 3055 (a)âThe payment or delivery was made in conjunction with an 3056 accurate and acceptable report. 3057 (b)âThe payment or delivery was made in a reasonable 3058 attempt to comply with this chapter and other applicable general 3059 law. 3060 (c)âThe holder had a reasonable basis for believing, based 3061 on the facts then known, that the property was abandoned 3062 unclaimed and subject to this chapter. 3063 (d)âThere is no showing that the records pursuant to which 3064 the delivery was made did not meet reasonable commercial 3065 standards of practice in the industry. 3066 (4)âAny holder who has delivered property, including a 3067 certificate of any interest in a business association, other 3068 than money to the department pursuant to this chapter may 3069 reclaim the property if still in the possession of the 3070 department, without payment of any fee or other charges, upon 3071 filing proof that the person entitled to the property owner has 3072 claimed it the property from the holder. 3073 Section 59.âSection 717.122, Florida Statutes, is amended 3074 to read: 3075 717.122âPublic sale of abandoned unclaimed property.â 3076 (1)âExcept as provided in paragraph (2)(a), the department 3077 after the receipt of abandoned unclaimed property shall sell it 3078 to the highest bidder at public sale on the Internet or at a 3079 specified physical location wherever in the judgment of the 3080 department the most favorable market for the property involved 3081 exists. The department may decline the highest bid and reoffer 3082 the property for sale if in the judgment of the department the 3083 bid is insufficient. The department shall have the discretion to 3084 withhold from sale any abandoned unclaimed property that the 3085 department deems to be of benefit to the people of the state. If 3086 in the judgment of the department the probable cost of sale 3087 exceeds the value of the property, it need not be offered for 3088 sale and may be disposed of as the department determines 3089 appropriate. Any sale at a specified physical location held 3090 under this section must be preceded by a single publication of 3091 notice, at least 3 weeks in advance of sale, in a newspaper of 3092 general circulation in the county in which the property is to be 3093 sold. The department shall proportionately deduct auction fees, 3094 preparation costs, and expenses from the amount posted to an the 3095 ownerâs account for an abandoned when safe-deposit box when the 3096 contents are sold. No action or proceeding may be maintained 3097 against the department for or on account of any decision to 3098 decline the highest bid or withhold any abandoned unclaimed 3099 property from sale. 3100 (2)(a)âSecurities listed on an established stock exchange 3101 must be sold at prices prevailing at the time of sale on the 3102 exchange. Other securities may be sold over the counter at 3103 prices prevailing at the time of sale or by any other method the 3104 department deems advisable. The department may authorize the 3105 agent or broker acting on behalf of the department to deduct 3106 fees from the proceeds of these sales at a rate agreed upon in 3107 advance by the agent or broker and the department. The 3108 department shall reimburse ownersâ accounts for these brokerage 3109 fees from the State School Fund unless the securities are sold 3110 at the ownerâs request. 3111 (b)âUnless the department deems it to be in the public 3112 interest to do otherwise, all abandoned securities presumed 3113 unclaimed and delivered to the department may be sold upon 3114 receipt. Any person making a claim pursuant to this chapter is 3115 entitled to receive either the securities delivered to the 3116 department by the holder, if they still remain in the hands of 3117 the department, or the proceeds received from sale, but no 3118 person has any claim under this chapter against the state, the 3119 holder, any transfer agent, any registrar, or any other person 3120 acting for or on behalf of a holder for any appreciation in the 3121 value of the property occurring after delivery by the holder to 3122 the state. 3123 (c)âCertificates for abandoned unclaimed stock or other 3124 equity interest of business associations that cannot be canceled 3125 and registered in the departmentâs name or that cannot be 3126 readily liquidated and converted into the currency of the United 3127 States may be sold for the value of the certificate, if any, in 3128 accordance with subsection (1) or may be destroyed in accordance 3129 with s. 717.128. 3130 (3)âThe purchaser of property at any sale conducted by the 3131 department pursuant to this chapter is entitled to ownership of 3132 the property purchased free from all claims of the owner or 3133 previous holder thereof and of all persons claiming through or 3134 under them. The department shall execute all documents necessary 3135 to complete the transfer of ownership. 3136 (4)âThe sale of abandoned unclaimed tangible personal 3137 property is not subject to tax under chapter 212 when such 3138 property is sold by or on behalf of the department pursuant to 3139 this section. 3140 Section 60.âSection 717.123, Florida Statutes, is amended 3141 to read: 3142 717.123âDeposit of funds.â 3143 (1)âAll funds received under this chapter, including the 3144 proceeds from the sale of abandoned unclaimed property under s. 3145 717.122, shall immediately forthwith be deposited by the 3146 department in the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund. The department 3147 shall retain, from funds received under this chapter, an amount 3148 not exceeding $15 million from which the department shall make 3149 prompt payment of claims allowed by the department and shall pay 3150 the costs incurred by the department in administering and 3151 enforcing this chapter. All remaining funds received by the 3152 department under this chapter shall be deposited by the 3153 department into the State School Fund. 3154 (2)âThe department shall record the name and last known 3155 address of each person appearing from the holderâs reports to be 3156 entitled to the abandoned unclaimed property in the total 3157 amounts of $5 or greater; the name and the last known address of 3158 each insured person or annuitant; and with respect to each 3159 policy or contract listed in the report of an insurance 3160 corporation, its number, the name of the corporation, and the 3161 amount due. 3162 Section 61.âSection 717.1235, Florida Statutes, is amended 3163 to read: 3164 717.1235âDormant campaign accounts; report of unclaimed 3165 property.âAbandoned Unclaimed funds reported in the name of a 3166 campaign for public office, for any campaign that must dispose 3167 of surplus funds in its campaign account pursuant to s. 106.141, 3168 after being reported to the department, shall be deposited with 3169 the Chief Financial Officer to the credit of the State School 3170 Fund. 3171 Section 62.âSection 717.124, Florida Statutes, is amended 3172 to read: 3173 717.124âAbandoned Unclaimed property claims.â 3174 (1)âAny person, excluding another state, claiming an 3175 interest in any property paid or delivered to the department 3176 under this chapter may file with the department a claim on a 3177 form prescribed by the department and verified by the claimant 3178 or the claimant claimantâs representative. The claimantâs 3179 representative must be an attorney licensed to practice law in 3180 this state, a licensed Florida-certified public accountant, or a 3181 private investigator licensed under chapter 493. The claimant 3182 claimantâs representative must be registered with the department 3183 under this chapter. The claimant, or the claimant claimantâs 3184 representative, shall provide the department with a legible copy 3185 of a valid driver license of the claimant at the time the 3186 original claim form is filed. If the claimant has not been 3187 issued a valid driver license at the time the original claim 3188 form is filed, the department must shall be provided with a 3189 legible copy of a photographic identification of the claimant 3190 issued by the United States, a state or territory of the United 3191 States, a foreign nation, or a political subdivision or agency 3192 thereof or other evidence deemed acceptable by the department by 3193 rule. In lieu of photographic identification, a notarized sworn 3194 statement by the claimant may be provided which affirms the 3195 claimantâs identity and states the claimantâs full name and 3196 address. The claimant must produce to the notary photographic 3197 identification of the claimant issued by the United States, a 3198 state or territory of the United States, a foreign nation, or a 3199 political subdivision or agency thereof or other evidence deemed 3200 acceptable by the department by rule. The notary shall indicate 3201 the notaryâs full address on the notarized sworn statement. Any 3202 claim filed without the required identification or the sworn 3203 statement with the original claim form and the original 3204 Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement or Abandoned 3205 Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement, if applicable, is void. 3206 (a)âWithin 90 days after receipt of a claim, the department 3207 may return any claim that provides for the receipt of fees and 3208 costs greater than that permitted under this chapter or that 3209 contains any apparent errors or omissions. The department may 3210 also request that the claimant or the claimant claimantâs 3211 representative provide additional information. The department 3212 shall retain a copy or electronic image of the claim. 3213 (b)âA claim is considered to have been withdrawn by a 3214 claimant or the claimantâs representative if any of the 3215 following applies: the department does not receive a response to 3216 its request for additional information within 60 days after the 3217 notification of any apparent errors or omissions. 3218 1.âThe department receives a written acknowledgment from 3219 the claimant confirming withdrawal of the claim. 3220 2.âThe department receives a written notice to withdraw the 3221 claim from a claimant representative which is accompanied by 3222 written authorization from the claimant expressly approving 3223 withdrawal of the claim. 3224 a.âThe authorization must state the reason for the 3225 withdrawal, contain an acknowledgment that the claimant 3226 understands that withdrawal will affect the processing of that 3227 claim and may affect the processing of other pending claims, and 3228 must be signed by the claimant. 3229 b.âThe claimantâs authorization must be submitted 3230 concurrently with, or as part of, the withdrawal notice. 3231 3.âThe claimant or the claimantâs representative fails to 3232 respond to the departmentâs written request for additional 3233 information within 60 days after the department provides notice 3234 of any apparent errors or omissions. 3235 (c)âWithin 90 days after receipt of the claim, or the 3236 response of the claimant or the claimant claimantâs 3237 representative to the departmentâs request for additional 3238 information, whichever is later, the department shall determine 3239 each claim. Such determination shall contain a notice of rights 3240 provided by ss. 120.569 and 120.57. The 90-day period shall be 3241 extended by 60 days if the department has good cause to need 3242 additional time or if the abandoned unclaimed property: 3243 1.âIs owned by a person who has been a debtor in 3244 bankruptcy; 3245 2.âWas reported with an address outside of the United 3246 States; 3247 3.âIs being claimed by a person outside of the United 3248 States; or 3249 4.âContains documents filed in support of the claim that 3250 are not in the English language and have not been accompanied by 3251 an English language translation. 3252 (2)âA claim for a cashierâs check or a stock certificate 3253 without the original instrument may require an indemnity bond 3254 equal to the value of the claim to be provided prior to issue of 3255 the stock or payment of the claim by the department. 3256 (3)âThe department may require an affidavit swearing to the 3257 authenticity of the claim, lack of documentation, and an 3258 agreement to allow the department to provide the name and 3259 address of the claimant to subsequent claimants coming forward 3260 with substantiated proof to claim the account. This shall apply 3261 to claims equal to or less than $250. The exclusive remedy of a 3262 subsequent claimant to the property shall be against the person 3263 who received the property from the department. 3264 (4)(a)âExcept as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a 3265 claim is determined in favor of the claimant, the department 3266 shall deliver or pay over to the claimant the property or the 3267 amount the department actually received or the proceeds if it 3268 has been sold by the department, together with any additional 3269 amount required by s. 717.121. 3270 (b)âIf a claimant an owner authorizes a claimant 3271 representative an attorney licensed to practice law in this 3272 state, a Florida-certified public accountant, or a private 3273 investigator licensed under chapter 493, and registered with the 3274 department under this chapter, to claim the abandoned unclaimed 3275 property on the claimantâs ownerâs behalf, the department is 3276 authorized to make distribution of the property or money in 3277 accordance with the Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery 3278 Agreement or Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement 3279 under s. 717.135. The original Abandoned Unclaimed Property 3280 Recovery Agreement or Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase 3281 Agreement must be executed by the claimant or seller and must be 3282 filed with the department. 3283 (c)1.âPayments of approved claims for unclaimed cash 3284 accounts must be made to the owner after deducting any fees and 3285 costs authorized by the claimant under an Abandoned Unclaimed 3286 Property Recovery Agreement. The contents of a safe-deposit box 3287 or shares of securities must be delivered directly to the 3288 claimant. 3289 2.âPayments of fees and costs authorized under an Abandoned 3290 Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement for approved claims must 3291 be made or issued to the law firm of the designated attorney 3292 licensed to practice law in this state, the public accountancy 3293 firm of the licensed Florida-certified public accountant, or the 3294 designated employing private investigative agency licensed by 3295 this state. Such payments shall be made by electronic funds 3296 transfer and may be made on such periodic schedule as the 3297 department may define by rule, provided the payment intervals do 3298 not exceed 31 days. Payment made to an attorney licensed in this 3299 state, a Florida-certified public accountant, or a private 3300 investigator licensed under chapter 493, operating individually 3301 or as a sole practitioner, must be to the attorney, certified 3302 public accountant, or private investigator. 3303 (5)âThe department is shall not be administratively, 3304 civilly, or criminally liable for any property or funds 3305 distributed pursuant to this section, provided such distribution 3306 is made in good faith. 3307 (6)âThis section does not supersede the licensing 3308 requirements of chapter 493. 3309 (7)âThe department may allow an apparent owner to 3310 electronically submit a claim for abandoned unclaimed property 3311 to the department. If a claim is submitted electronically for 3312 $2,000 or less, the department may use a method of identity 3313 verification other than a copy of a valid driver license, other 3314 government-issued photographic identification, or a sworn 3315 notarized statement. The department may adopt rules to implement 3316 this subsection. 3317 (8)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, 3318 the department may develop and implement an identification 3319 verification and disbursement process by which an account valued 3320 at $2,000 or less, after being received by the department and 3321 added to the abandoned unclaimed property database, may be 3322 disbursed to an apparent owner after the department has verified 3323 that the apparent owner is living and that the apparent ownerâs 3324 current address is correct. The department shall include with 3325 the payment a notification and explanation of the dollar amount, 3326 the source, and the property type of each account included in 3327 the disbursement. The department shall adopt rules to implement 3328 this subsection. 3329 (9)(a)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, 3330 the department may develop and implement a verification and 3331 disbursement process by which an account, after being received 3332 by the department and added to the abandoned unclaimed property 3333 database, for which the apparent owner entity is: 3334 1.âA state agency in this state or a subdivision or 3335 successor agency thereof; 3336 2.âA county government in this state or a subdivision 3337 thereof; 3338 3.âA public school district in this state or a subdivision 3339 thereof; 3340 4.âA municipality in this state or a subdivision thereof; 3341 or 3342 5.âA special taxing district or authority in this state, 3343 3344 may be disbursed to the apparent owner entity or successor 3345 entity. The department shall include with the payment a 3346 notification and explanation of the dollar amount, the source, 3347 and the property type of each account included in the 3348 disbursement. 3349 (b)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 3350 subsection. 3351 (10)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, 3352 the department may develop a process by which a claimant 3353 claimantâs representative or a buyer of unclaimed property may 3354 electronically submit to the department an electronic image of a 3355 completed claim and claims-related documents under this chapter, 3356 including an Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement or 3357 Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement that has been 3358 signed and dated by a claimant or seller under s. 717.135, after 3359 the claimant claimantâs representative or the buyer of unclaimed 3360 property receives the original documents provided by the 3361 claimant or the seller for any claim. Each claim filed by a 3362 claimant claimantâs representative or a buyer of unclaimed 3363 property must include a statement by the claimant claimantâs 3364 representative or the buyer of unclaimed property attesting that 3365 all documents are true copies of the original documents and that 3366 all original documents are physically in the possession of the 3367 claimant claimantâs representative or the buyer of unclaimed 3368 property. All original documents must be kept in the original 3369 form, by claim number, under the secure control of the claimant 3370 claimantâs representative or the buyer of unclaimed property and 3371 must be available for inspection by the department in accordance 3372 with s. 717.1315. The department may adopt rules to implement 3373 this subsection. 3374 (11)âThis section applies to all abandoned unclaimed 3375 property reported and remitted to the Chief Financial Officer, 3376 including, but not limited to, property reported pursuant to ss. 3377 45.032, 732.107, 733.816, and 744.534. 3378 Section 63.âSection 717.12403, Florida Statutes, is amended 3379 to read: 3380 717.12403âAbandoned Unclaimed demand, savings, or checking 3381 account in a financial institution held in the name of more than 3382 one person.â 3383 (1)(a)âIf an abandoned unclaimed demand, savings, or 3384 checking account in a financial institution is reported as an 3385 âandâ account in the name of two or more persons who are not 3386 beneficiaries, it is presumed that each person must claim the 3387 account in order for the claim to be approved by the department. 3388 This presumption may be rebutted by showing that entitlement to 3389 the account has been transferred to another person or by clear 3390 and convincing evidence demonstrating that the account should 3391 have been reported by the financial institution as an âorâ 3392 account. 3393 (b)âIf an abandoned unclaimed demand, savings, or checking 3394 account in a financial institution is reported as an âandâ 3395 account and one of the persons on the account is deceased, it is 3396 presumed that the account is a survivorship account. This 3397 presumption may be rebutted by showing that entitlement to the 3398 account has been transferred to another person or by clear and 3399 convincing evidence demonstrating that the account is not a 3400 survivorship account. 3401 (2)âIf an abandoned unclaimed demand, savings, or checking 3402 account in a financial institution is reported as an âorâ 3403 account in the name of two or more persons who are not 3404 beneficiaries, it is presumed that either person listed on the 3405 account may claim the entire amount held in the account. This 3406 presumption may be rebutted by showing that entitlement to the 3407 account has been transferred to another person or by clear and 3408 convincing evidence demonstrating that the account should have 3409 been reported by the financial institution as an âandâ account. 3410 (3)âIf an abandoned unclaimed demand, savings, or checking 3411 account in a financial institution is reported in the name of 3412 two or more persons who are not beneficiaries without 3413 identifying whether the account is an âandâ account or an âorâ 3414 account, it is presumed that the account is an âorâ account. 3415 This presumption may be rebutted by showing that entitlement to 3416 the account has been transferred to another person or by clear 3417 and convincing evidence demonstrating that the account should 3418 have been reported by the financial institution as an âandâ 3419 account. 3420 (4)âThe department shall be deemed to have made a 3421 distribution in good faith if the department remits funds 3422 consistent with this section. 3423 Section 64.âSubsection (2) of section 717.12404, Florida 3424 Statutes, is amended to read: 3425 717.12404âClaims on behalf of a business entity or trust.â 3426 (2)âClaims on behalf of an active or a dissolved 3427 corporation, a business entity other than an active corporation, 3428 or a trust must include a legible copy of a valid driver license 3429 of the person acting on behalf of the dissolved corporation, 3430 business entity other than an active corporation, or trust. If 3431 the person has not been issued a valid driver license, the 3432 department shall be provided with a legible copy of a 3433 photographic identification of the person issued by the United 3434 States, a foreign nation, or a political subdivision or agency 3435 thereof. In lieu of photographic identification, a notarized 3436 sworn statement by the person may be provided which affirms the 3437 personâs identity and states the personâs full name and address. 3438 The person must produce his or her photographic identification 3439 issued by the United States, a state or territory of the United 3440 States, a foreign nation, or a political subdivision or agency 3441 thereof or other evidence deemed acceptable by the department by 3442 rule. The notary shall indicate the notaryâs full address on the 3443 notarized sworn statement. Any claim filed without the required 3444 identification or the sworn statement with the original claim 3445 form and the original Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery 3446 Agreement or Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement, if 3447 applicable, is void. 3448 Section 65.âSection 717.12405, Florida Statutes, is amended 3449 to read: 3450 717.12405âClaims by estates.âAn estate or any person 3451 representing an estate or acting on behalf of an estate may 3452 claim abandoned unclaimed property only after the heir or 3453 legatee of the decedent entitled to the property has been 3454 located. Any estate, or any person representing an estate or 3455 acting on behalf of an estate, that receives abandoned unclaimed 3456 property before the heir or legatee of the decedent entitled to 3457 the property has been located, is personally liable for the 3458 abandoned unclaimed property and must immediately return the 3459 full amount of the abandoned unclaimed property or the value 3460 thereof to the department in accordance with s. 717.1341. 3461 Section 66.âSection 717.12406, Florida Statutes, is amended 3462 to read: 3463 717.12406âJoint ownership of abandoned unclaimed securities 3464 or dividends.âFor the purpose of determining joint ownership of 3465 abandoned unclaimed securities or dividends, the term: 3466 (1)ââTEN COMâ means tenants in common. 3467 (2)ââTEN ENTâ means tenants by the entireties. 3468 (3)ââJT TENâ or âJTâ means joint tenants with the right of 3469 survivorship and not as tenants in common. 3470 (4)ââAndâ means tenants in common with each person entitled 3471 to an equal pro rata share. 3472 (5)ââOrâ means that each person listed on the account is 3473 entitled to all of the funds. 3474 Section 67.âSection 717.1241, Florida Statutes, is amended 3475 to read: 3476 717.1241âConflicting claims.â 3477 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âconflicting 3478 claimâ means two or more claims received by the department for 3479 the same abandoned property account or accounts in which two or 3480 more claimants appear to be equally entitled to the property. 3481 The term also includes circumstances in which the same claimant 3482 has more than one claim pending for the same property, including 3483 when the claimant is represented by more than one claimant 3484 representative or submits both a personal claim and a claim 3485 through a representative. 3486 (2)âWhen conflicting claims have been received by the 3487 department for the same abandoned unclaimed property account or 3488 accounts, the property shall be remitted in accordance with the 3489 claim filed by the person as follows, notwithstanding the 3490 withdrawal of a claim: 3491 (a)âTo the person submitting the first claim received by 3492 the Division of Unclaimed Property of the department that is 3493 complete or made complete. 3494 (b)âIf a claimantâs claim and a claimant claimantâs 3495 representativeâs claim for the recovery of property are received 3496 by the Division of Unclaimed Property of the department on the 3497 same day and both claims are complete, to the claimant. 3498 (c)âIf a buyerâs claim or a purchasing claimant 3499 representativeâs claim and a claimantâs claim or a claimant 3500 claimantâs representativeâs claim for the recovery of property 3501 are received by the Division of Unclaimed Property of the 3502 department on the same day and the claims are complete, to the 3503 buyer. 3504 (d)âAs between two or more claimant representativesâ 3505 claimantâs representativeâs claims received by the Division of 3506 Unclaimed Property of the department that are complete or made 3507 complete on the same day, to the claimant claimantâs 3508 representative who has agreed to receive the lowest fee. If the 3509 two or more claimant claimantâs representatives whose claims 3510 received by the Division of Unclaimed Property of the department 3511 were complete or made complete on the same day are charging the 3512 same lowest fee, the fee shall be divided equally between the 3513 claimant claimantâs representatives. 3514 (e)âIf more than one buyerâs claim received by the Division 3515 of Unclaimed Property of the department is complete or made 3516 complete on the same day, the department shall remit the 3517 abandoned unclaimed property to the buyer who paid the highest 3518 amount to the seller. If the buyers paid the same amount to the 3519 seller, the department shall remit the abandoned unclaimed 3520 property to the buyers divided in equal amounts. 3521 (3)(2)âThe purpose of this section is solely to provide 3522 guidance to the department regarding to whom it should remit the 3523 abandoned unclaimed property and is not intended to extinguish 3524 or affect any private cause of action that any person may have 3525 against another person for breach of contract or other statutory 3526 or common-law remedy. A buyerâs sole remedy, if any, shall be 3527 against the claimant claimantâs representative or the seller, or 3528 both. A claimant claimantâs representativeâs sole remedy, if 3529 any, shall be against the buyer or the seller, or both. A 3530 claimantâs or sellerâs sole remedy, if any, shall be against the 3531 buyer or the claimant claimantâs representative, or both. 3532 Nothing in this section forecloses the right of a person to 3533 challenge the departmentâs determination of completeness in a 3534 proceeding under ss. 120.569 and 120.57. 3535 (4)(3)âA claim is complete when entitlement to the 3536 abandoned unclaimed property has been established. 3537 Section 68.âSubsection (1) of section 717.1242, Florida 3538 Statutes, is amended to read: 3539 717.1242âRestatement of jurisdiction of the circuit court 3540 sitting in probate and the department.â 3541 (1)âIt is and has been the intent of the Legislature that, 3542 pursuant to s. 26.012(2)(b), circuit courts have jurisdiction of 3543 proceedings relating to the settlement of the estates of 3544 decedents and other jurisdiction usually pertaining to courts of 3545 probate. It is and has been the intent of the Legislature that, 3546 pursuant to this chapter, the department determines the merits 3547 of claims and entitlement to abandoned unclaimed property paid 3548 or delivered to the department under this chapter. Consistent 3549 with this legislative intent, any beneficiary, devisee, heir, 3550 personal representative, or other interested person, as those 3551 terms are defined in the Florida Probate Code and the Florida 3552 Trust Code, of an estate seeking to obtain property paid or 3553 delivered to the department under this chapter must file a claim 3554 with the department as provided in s. 717.124. 3555 Section 69.âSubsections (1) and (4) of section 717.1243, 3556 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3557 717.1243âSmall estate accounts.â 3558 (1)âA claim for abandoned unclaimed property made by a 3559 beneficiary, as defined in s. 731.201, of a deceased owner need 3560 not be accompanied by an order of a probate court if the 3561 claimant files with the department an affidavit, signed by all 3562 beneficiaries, stating that all the beneficiaries have amicably 3563 agreed among themselves upon a division of the estate and that 3564 all funeral expenses, expenses of the last illness, and any 3565 other lawful claims have been paid, and any additional 3566 information reasonably necessary to make a determination of 3567 entitlement. If the owner died testate, the claim shall be 3568 accompanied by a copy of the will. 3569 (4)âThis section applies only if all of the abandoned 3570 unclaimed property held by the department on behalf of the owner 3571 has an aggregate value of $20,000 or less and no probate 3572 proceeding is pending. 3573 Section 70.âSection 717.1244, Florida Statutes, is amended 3574 to read: 3575 717.1244âDeterminations of abandoned unclaimed property 3576 claims.âIn rendering a determination regarding the merits of an 3577 abandoned unclaimed property claim, the department shall rely on 3578 the applicable statutory, regulatory, common, and case law. 3579 Agency statements applying the statutory, regulatory, common, 3580 and case law to abandoned unclaimed property claims are not 3581 agency statements subject to s. 120.56(4). 3582 Section 71.âSection 717.1245, Florida Statutes, is amended 3583 to read: 3584 717.1245âGarnishment of abandoned unclaimed property.âIf 3585 any person files a petition for writ of garnishment seeking to 3586 obtain property paid or delivered to the department under this 3587 chapter, the petitioner shall be ordered to pay the department 3588 reasonable costs and attorney attorneyâs fees in any proceeding 3589 brought by the department to oppose, appeal, or collaterally 3590 attack the petition or writ if the department is the prevailing 3591 party in any such proceeding. 3592 Section 72.âSubsection (1) of section 717.125, Florida 3593 Statutes, is amended to read: 3594 717.125âClaim of another state to recover property; 3595 procedure.â 3596 (1)âAt any time after property has been paid or delivered 3597 to the department under this chapter, another state may recover 3598 the property if: 3599 (a)âThe property was subjected to custody by this state 3600 because the records of the holder did not reflect the last known 3601 address of the apparent owner when the property was presumed 3602 abandoned unclaimed under this chapter, and the other state 3603 establishes that the last known address of the apparent owner or 3604 other person entitled to the property was in that state and 3605 under the laws of that state the property escheated to or was 3606 subject to a claim of abandonment or being unclaimed by that 3607 state; 3608 (b)âThe last known address of the apparent owner or other 3609 person entitled to the property, as reflected by the records of 3610 the holder, is in the other state and under the laws of that 3611 state the property has escheated to or become subject to a claim 3612 of abandonment by that state; 3613 (c)âThe records of the holder were erroneous in that they 3614 did not accurately reflect the actual owner of the property and 3615 the last known address of the actual owner is in the other state 3616 and under laws of that state the property escheated to or was 3617 subject to a claim of abandonment by that state; 3618 (d)âThe property was subject to custody by this state under 3619 s. 717.103(6) and under the laws of the state of domicile of the 3620 holder the property has escheated to or become subject to a 3621 claim of abandonment by that state; or 3622 (e)âThe property is the sum payable on a travelerâs check, 3623 money order, or other similar instrument that was subjected to 3624 custody by this state under s. 717.104, and the instrument was 3625 purchased in the other state, and under the laws of that state 3626 the property escheated to or became subject to a claim of 3627 abandonment by that state. 3628 Section 73.âSubsection (1) of section 717.126, Florida 3629 Statutes, is amended to read: 3630 717.126âAdministrative hearing; burden of proof; proof of 3631 entitlement; venue.â 3632 (1)âAny person aggrieved by a decision of the department 3633 may petition for a hearing as provided in ss. 120.569 and 3634 120.57. In any proceeding for determination of a claim to 3635 property paid or delivered to the department under this chapter, 3636 the burden shall be upon the claimant to establish entitlement 3637 to the property by a preponderance of evidence. Having the same 3638 name as that reported to the department is not sufficient, in 3639 the absence of other evidence, to prove entitlement to abandoned 3640 unclaimed property. 3641 Section 74.âSection 717.1261, Florida Statutes, is amended 3642 to read: 3643 717.1261âDeath certificates.âAny person who claims 3644 entitlement to abandoned unclaimed property by means of the 3645 death of one or more persons shall file a copy of the death 3646 certificate of the decedent or decedents that has been certified 3647 as being authentic by the issuing governmental agency. 3648 Section 75.âSection 717.1262, Florida Statutes, is amended 3649 to read: 3650 717.1262âCourt documents.âAny person who claims entitlement 3651 to abandoned unclaimed property by reason of a court document 3652 shall file a certified copy of the court document with the 3653 department. A certified copy of each pleading filed with the 3654 court to obtain a court document establishing entitlement, filed 3655 within 180 days before the date the claim form was signed by the 3656 claimant or claimant claimantâs representative, must also be 3657 filed with the department. 3658 Section 76.âSection 717.129, Florida Statutes, is amended 3659 to read: 3660 717.129âPeriods of limitation.â 3661 (1)âThe expiration before or after July 1, 1987, of any 3662 period of time specified by contract, statute, or court order, 3663 during which a claim for money or property may be made or during 3664 which an action or proceeding may be commenced or enforced to 3665 obtain payment of a claim for money or to recover property, does 3666 not prevent the money or property from being presumed abandoned 3667 unclaimed or affect any duty to file a report or to pay or 3668 deliver abandoned unclaimed property to the department as 3669 required by this chapter. 3670 (2)âThe department may not commence an action or proceeding 3671 to enforce this chapter with respect to the reporting, payment, 3672 or delivery of property or any other duty of a holder under this 3673 chapter more than 10 years after the duty arose. The period of 3674 limitation established under this subsection is tolled by the 3675 earlier of the departmentâs or audit agentâs delivery of a 3676 notice that a holder is subject to an audit or examination under 3677 s. 717.1301 or the holderâs written election to enter into an 3678 abandoned unclaimed property voluntary disclosure agreement. 3679 Section 77.âSubsections (3) and (4) of section 717.1301, 3680 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3681 717.1301âInvestigations; examinations; subpoenas.â 3682 (3)âThe department may authorize a compliance review of a 3683 report for a specified reporting year. The review must be 3684 limited to the contents of the report filed, as required by s. 3685 717.117 and subsection (2), and all supporting documents related 3686 to the reports. If the review results in a finding of a 3687 deficiency in abandoned unclaimed property due and payable to 3688 the department, the department shall notify the holder in 3689 writing of the amount of deficiency within 1 year after the 3690 authorization of the compliance review. If the holder fails to 3691 pay the deficiency within 90 days, the department may seek to 3692 enforce the assessment under subsection (1). The department is 3693 not required to conduct a review under this section before 3694 initiating an audit. 3695 (4)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, in a 3696 contract providing for the location or collection of abandoned 3697 unclaimed property, the department may authorize the contractor 3698 to deduct its fees and expenses for services provided under the 3699 contract from the abandoned unclaimed property that the 3700 contractor has recovered or collected under the contract. The 3701 department shall annually report to the Chief Financial Officer 3702 the total amount collected or recovered by each contractor 3703 during the previous fiscal year and the total fees and expenses 3704 deducted by each contractor. 3705 Section 78.âSection 717.1315, Florida Statutes, is amended 3706 to read: 3707 717.1315âRetention of records by claimant claimantâs 3708 representatives and buyers of abandoned unclaimed property.â 3709 (1)âEvery claimant claimantâs representative and buyer of 3710 abandoned unclaimed property shall keep and use in his or her 3711 business such books, accounts, and records of the business 3712 conducted under this chapter to enable the department to 3713 determine whether such person is complying with this chapter and 3714 the rules adopted by the department under this chapter. Every 3715 claimant claimantâs representative and buyer of abandoned 3716 unclaimed property shall preserve such books, accounts, and 3717 records, including every Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery 3718 Agreement or Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement 3719 between the owner and such claimant claimantâs representative or 3720 buyer, for at least 3 years after the date of the initial 3721 agreement. 3722 (2)âA claimant claimantâs representative or buyer of 3723 abandoned unclaimed property, operating at two or more places of 3724 business in this state, may maintain the books, accounts, and 3725 records of all such offices at any one of such offices, or at 3726 any other office maintained by such claimant claimantâs 3727 representative or buyer of abandoned unclaimed property, upon 3728 the filing of a written notice with the department designating 3729 in the written notice the office at which such records are 3730 maintained. 3731 (3)âA claimant claimantâs representative or buyer of 3732 abandoned unclaimed property shall make all books, accounts, and 3733 records available at a convenient location in this state upon 3734 request of the department. 3735 Section 79.âSubsection (2) of section 717.132, Florida 3736 Statutes, is amended to read: 3737 717.132âEnforcement; cease and desist orders; fines.â 3738 (2)âIn addition to any other powers conferred upon it to 3739 enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter, the 3740 department may issue and serve upon a person an order to cease 3741 and desist and to take corrective action whenever the department 3742 finds that such person is violating, has violated, or is about 3743 to violate any provision of this chapter, any rule or order 3744 promulgated under this chapter, or any written agreement entered 3745 into with the department. For purposes of this subsection, the 3746 term âcorrective actionâ includes refunding excessive charges, 3747 requiring a person to return abandoned unclaimed property, 3748 requiring a holder to remit abandoned unclaimed property, and 3749 requiring a holder to correct a report that contains errors or 3750 omissions. Any such order shall contain a notice of rights 3751 provided by ss. 120.569 and 120.57. 3752 Section 80.âParagraphs (c), (d), and (j) of subsection (1), 3753 subsections (2) and (3), paragraph (b) of subsection (4), and 3754 subsection (5) of section 717.1322, Florida Statutes, are 3755 amended to read: 3756 717.1322âAdministrative and civil enforcement.â 3757 (1)âThe following acts are violations of this chapter and 3758 constitute grounds for an administrative enforcement action by 3759 the department in accordance with the requirements of chapter 3760 120 and for civil enforcement by the department in a court of 3761 competent jurisdiction: 3762 (c)âFraudulent Misrepresentation, circumvention, or 3763 concealment of any matter required to be stated or furnished to 3764 the department or to an owner or apparent owner under this 3765 chapter, regardless of reliance by or damage to the owner or 3766 apparent owner. 3767 (d)âWillful Imposition of illegal or excessive charges in 3768 any abandoned unclaimed property transaction. 3769 (j)âRequesting or receiving compensation for notifying a 3770 person of his or her abandoned unclaimed property or assisting 3771 another person in filing a claim for abandoned unclaimed 3772 property, unless the person is an attorney licensed to practice 3773 law in this state, a Florida-certified public accountant, or a 3774 private investigator licensed under chapter 493, or entering 3775 into, or making a solicitation to enter into, an agreement to 3776 file a claim for abandoned unclaimed property owned by another, 3777 unless such person is a registered claimant representative 3778 registered with the department under this chapter and an 3779 attorney licensed to practice law in this state in the regular 3780 practice of her or his profession, a Florida-certified public 3781 accountant who is acting within the scope of the practice of 3782 public accounting as defined in chapter 473, or a private 3783 investigator licensed under chapter 493. This paragraph does not 3784 apply to a person who has been granted a durable power of 3785 attorney to convey and receive all of the real and personal 3786 property of the owner, is the court-appointed guardian of the 3787 owner, has been employed as an attorney or qualified 3788 representative to contest the departmentâs denial of a claim, or 3789 has been employed as an attorney to probate the estate of the 3790 owner or an heir or legatee of the owner. 3791 (2)âUpon a finding by the department that any person has 3792 committed any of the acts set forth in subsection (1), the 3793 department may enter an order doing any of the following: 3794 (a)âRevoking for a minimum of 5 years or suspending for a 3795 maximum of 5 years a registration previously granted under this 3796 chapter during which time the registrant may not reapply for a 3797 registration under this chapter.; 3798 (b)âPlacing a claimant representative registrant or an 3799 applicant for a registration on probation for a period of time 3800 and subject to such conditions as the department may specify.; 3801 (c)âPlacing permanent restrictions or conditions upon 3802 issuance or maintenance of a registration under this chapter.; 3803 (d)âIssuing a reprimand.; 3804 (e)âImposing an administrative fine not to exceed $2,000 3805 for each such act.; or 3806 (f)âProhibiting any person from being a director, officer, 3807 agent, employee, or ultimate equitable owner of a 10 percent 10 3808 percent or greater interest in an employer of a claimant 3809 representative registrant. 3810 (3)âA claimant claimantâs representative is subject to 3811 civil enforcement and the disciplinary actions specified in 3812 subsection (2) for violations of subsection (1) by an agent or 3813 employee of the claimant representativeâs registrantâs employer 3814 if the claimant claimantâs representative knew or should have 3815 known that such agent or employee was violating any provision of 3816 this chapter. 3817 (4) 3818 (b)âThe disciplinary guidelines shall specify a meaningful 3819 range of designated penalties based upon the severity or 3820 repetition of specific offenses, or both. It is the legislative 3821 intent that minor violations be distinguished from more serious 3822 violations; that such guidelines consider the amount of the 3823 claim involved, the complexity of locating the owner, the steps 3824 taken to ensure the accuracy of the claim by the person filing 3825 the claim, the acts of commission and omission of the claimant 3826 ultimate owners in establishing themselves as rightful owners of 3827 the funds, the acts of commission or omission of the agent or 3828 employee of a claimant representative or its an employer in the 3829 filing of the claim, the actual knowledge of the agent, 3830 employee, employer, or owner in the filing of the claim, the 3831 departure, if any, by the agent or employee from the internal 3832 controls and procedures established by the claimant 3833 representative or its employer with regard to the filing of a 3834 claim, the number of defective claims previously filed by the 3835 agent, employee, employer, or owner; that such guidelines 3836 provide reasonable and meaningful notice of likely penalties 3837 that may be imposed for proscribed conduct; and that such 3838 penalties be consistently applied by the department. 3839 (5)âThe department may seek any appropriate civil legal 3840 remedy available to it by filing a civil action in a court of 3841 competent jurisdiction against any person who has, directly or 3842 through a claimant claimantâs representative, wrongfully 3843 submitted a claim as the ultimate owner of property and 3844 improperly received funds from the department in violation of 3845 this chapter. 3846 Section 81.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 717.133, 3847 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3848 717.133âInterstate agreements and cooperation; joint and 3849 reciprocal actions with other states.â 3850 (1)âThe department may enter into agreements with other 3851 states to exchange information needed to enable this or another 3852 state to audit or otherwise determine abandoned unclaimed 3853 property that it or another state may be entitled to subject to 3854 a claim of custody. The department may require the reporting of 3855 information needed to enable compliance with agreements made 3856 pursuant to this section and prescribe the form. 3857 (3)âAt the request of another state, the department may 3858 bring an action in the name of the other state in any court of 3859 competent jurisdiction to enforce the abandoned unclaimed 3860 property laws of the other state against a holder in this state 3861 of property subject to escheat or a claim of abandonment by the 3862 other state, if the other state has agreed to pay expenses 3863 incurred in bringing the action. 3864 Section 82.âSubsection (2) of section 717.1333, Florida 3865 Statutes, is amended to read: 3866 717.1333âEvidence; estimations; audit reports and 3867 worksheets, investigator reports and worksheets, other related 3868 documents.â 3869 (2)âIf the records of the holder that are available for the 3870 periods subject to this chapter are insufficient to permit the 3871 preparation of a report of the abandoned unclaimed property due 3872 and owing by a holder, or if the holder fails to provide records 3873 after being requested to do so, the amount due to the department 3874 may be reasonably estimated. 3875 Section 83.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsections 3876 (2) and (4) of section 717.1341, Florida Statutes, are amended 3877 to read: 3878 717.1341âInvalid claims, recovery of property, interest and 3879 penalties.â 3880 (1)(a)âA No person may not shall receive abandoned 3881 unclaimed property that the person is not entitled to receive. 3882 Any person who receives, or assists another person to receive, 3883 abandoned unclaimed property that the person is not entitled to 3884 receive is strictly, jointly, personally, and severally liable 3885 for the abandoned unclaimed property and shall immediately 3886 return the property, or the reasonable value of the property if 3887 the property has been damaged or disposed of, to the department 3888 plus interest at the rate set in accordance with s. 55.03(1). 3889 Assisting another person to receive abandoned unclaimed property 3890 includes executing a claim form on the personâs behalf. 3891 (2)âThe department may maintain a civil or administrative 3892 action: 3893 (a)âTo recover abandoned unclaimed property that was paid 3894 or remitted to a person who was not entitled to the abandoned 3895 unclaimed property or to offset amounts owed to the department 3896 against amounts owed to an owner representative; 3897 (b)âAgainst a person who assists another person in 3898 receiving, or attempting to receive, abandoned unclaimed 3899 property that the person is not entitled to receive; or 3900 (c)âAgainst a person who attempts to receive abandoned 3901 unclaimed property that the person is not entitled to receive. 3902 (4)âA No person may not shall knowingly file, knowingly 3903 conspire to file, or knowingly assist in filing, a claim for 3904 abandoned unclaimed property the person is not entitled to 3905 receive. Any person who violates this subsection regarding 3906 abandoned unclaimed property of an aggregate value: 3907 (a)âGreater than $50,000, commits is guilty of a felony of 3908 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 3909 775.083, or s. 775.084; 3910 (b)âGreater than $10,000 up to $50,000, commits is guilty 3911 of a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 3912 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084; 3913 (c)âGreater than $250 up to $10,000, commits is guilty of a 3914 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 3915 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084; 3916 (d)âGreater than $50 up to $250, commits is guilty of a 3917 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 3918 775.082 or s. 775.083; or 3919 (e)âUp to $50, commits is guilty of a misdemeanor of the 3920 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 3921 775.083. 3922 Section 84.âSection 717.135, Florida Statutes, is amended 3923 to read: 3924 717.135âRecovery agreements and purchase agreements for 3925 claims filed by a claimant claimantâs representative; fees and 3926 costs or total net gain.â 3927 (1)âIn order to protect the interests of owners of 3928 abandoned unclaimed property, the department shall adopt by rule 3929 a form entitled âAbandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery 3930 Agreementâ and a form entitled âAbandoned Unclaimed Property 3931 Purchase Agreement.â 3932 (2)âThe Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement and 3933 the Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement must include 3934 and disclose all of the following: 3935 (a)âThe total dollar amount of abandoned unclaimed property 3936 accounts claimed or sold. 3937 (b)âThe total percentage of all authorized fees and costs 3938 to be paid to the claimant claimantâs representative or the 3939 percentage of the value of the property to be paid as net gain 3940 to the purchasing claimant claimantâs representative. 3941 (c)âThe total dollar amount to be deducted and received 3942 from the claimant as fees and costs by the claimant claimantâs 3943 representative or the total net dollar amount to be received by 3944 the purchasing claimant claimantâs representative. 3945 (d)âThe net dollar amount to be received by the claimant or 3946 the seller. 3947 (e)âFor each account claimed, the abandoned unclaimed 3948 property account number. 3949 (f)âFor the Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase 3950 Agreement, a statement that the amount of the purchase price 3951 will be remitted to the seller by the purchaser within 30 days 3952 after the execution of the agreement by the seller. 3953 (g)âThe name, address, e-mail address, phone number, and 3954 license number of the claimant claimantâs representative. 3955 (h)1.âThe manual signature of the claimant or seller and 3956 the date signed, affixed on the agreement by the claimant or 3957 seller. 3958 2.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to 3959 the contrary, the department may allow an apparent owner, who is 3960 also the claimant or seller, to sign the agreement 3961 electronically. All electronic signatures on the Abandoned 3962 Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement and the Abandoned 3963 Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement must be affixed on the 3964 agreement by the claimant or seller using the specific, 3965 exclusive eSignature product and protocol authorized by the 3966 department. 3967 (i)âThe social security number or taxpayer identification 3968 number of the claimant or seller, if a number has been issued to 3969 the claimant or seller. 3970 (j)âThe total fees and costs, or the total discount in the 3971 case of a purchase agreement, which may not exceed 30 percent of 3972 the claimed amount. In the case of a recovery agreement, if the 3973 total fees and costs exceed 30 percent, the fees and costs shall 3974 be reduced to 30 percent and the net balance shall be remitted 3975 directly by the department to the claimant. In the case of a 3976 purchase agreement, if the total net gain of the claimant 3977 claimantâs representative exceeds 30 percent, the claim will be 3978 denied. 3979 (3)âFor an Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement 3980 form, proof that the purchaser has made payment must be filed 3981 with the department along with the claim. If proof of payment is 3982 not provided, the claim is void. 3983 (4)âA claimant claimantâs representative must use the 3984 Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement or the Abandoned 3985 Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement as the exclusive means of 3986 entering into an agreement or a contract with a claimant or 3987 seller to file a claim with the department. 3988 (5)âFees and costs may be owed or paid to, or received by, 3989 a claimant claimantâs representative only after a filed claim 3990 has been approved and if the claimantâs representative used an 3991 agreement authorized by this section. 3992 (6)âA claimant claimantâs representative may not use or 3993 distribute any other agreement of any type, conveyed by any 3994 method, with respect to the claimant or seller which relates, 3995 directly or indirectly, to abandoned unclaimed property accounts 3996 held by the department or the Chief Financial Officer other than 3997 the agreements authorized by this section. Any engagement, 3998 authorization, recovery, or fee agreement that is not authorized 3999 by this section is void. A claimant claimantâs representative is 4000 subject to administrative and civil enforcement under s. 4001 717.1322 if he or she uses an agreement that is not authorized 4002 by this section and if the agreement is used to apply, directly 4003 or indirectly, to abandoned unclaimed property held by this 4004 state. This subsection does not prohibit lawful nonagreement, 4005 noncontractual, or advertising communications between or among 4006 the parties. 4007 (7)âThe Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement may 4008 not contain language that makes the agreement irrevocable or 4009 that creates an assignment of any portion of abandoned unclaimed 4010 property held by the department. 4011 (8)âWhen a claim is approved, the department may pay any 4012 additional account that is owned by the claimant but has not 4013 been claimed at the time of approval, provided that a subsequent 4014 claim has not been filed or is not pending for the claimant at 4015 the time of approval. 4016 (9)âThis section does not supersede s. 717.1241. 4017 (10)âThis section does not apply to the sale and purchase 4018 of Florida-held unclaimed property accounts through a bankruptcy 4019 estate representative or other person or entity authorized 4020 pursuant to Title XI of the United States Code or an order of a 4021 bankruptcy court to act on behalf or for the benefit of the 4022 debtor, its creditors, and its bankruptcy estate. 4023 Section 85.âSection 717.1356, Florida Statutes, is created 4024 to read: 4025 717.1356âPurchase of abandoned property.â 4026 (1)âAgreements for the purchase of abandoned property 4027 reported to the department shall be valid only if all of the 4028 following conditions are met: 4029 (a)âThe agreement is entitled âFlorida Abandoned Property 4030 Purchase Agreementâ and is in writing, in minimum 12-point type. 4031 (b)âThe agreement includes the social security number or 4032 taxpayer identification number of the seller, if a number has 4033 been issued to the seller; a valid e-mail address, mailing 4034 address, and telephone number for the seller; and is manually 4035 signed and dated by the seller with the signature notarized. 4036 (c)âThe agreement discloses with specificity the nature and 4037 value of the abandoned property, including the name of the 4038 apparent owner as shown by the records of the department, the 4039 name of the holder who remitted the property, the date of last 4040 contact, and the property category. With respect to the value of 4041 the abandoned property, the agreement must contain the 4042 following: 4043 1.âThe total dollar amount of all abandoned property to be 4044 sold. 4045 2.âThe total percentage of the value of the abandoned 4046 property to be paid as net gain to the purchaser. 4047 3.âThe total net dollar amount to be received by the 4048 purchaser. 4049 4.âThe net dollar amount to be received by the seller. 4050 (d)âThe agreement states the abandoned property account 4051 number for each abandoned property account sold. 4052 (e)âThe purchase price does not discount the total value of 4053 all abandoned property subject to the sale by more than 30 4054 percent. 4055 (f)âThe agreement states that the amount of the purchase 4056 price will be remitted to the seller by the purchaser within 30 4057 days after the execution of the agreement by the seller. 4058 (g)âThe agreement includes the name, address, e-mail 4059 address, and phone number of the purchaser. 4060 (h)âThe agreement states that the abandoned property is 4061 currently in the departmentâs custody and that the seller can 4062 claim the property directly from the department on its 4063 electronically searchable website without being charged a fee. 4064 The agreement must provide the departmentâs website address. 4065 (2)âA seller may cancel a purchase agreement without 4066 penalty or obligation within 15 business days after the date on 4067 which the agreement was executed. The agreement must contain the 4068 following language in minimum 12-point type: âYou may cancel 4069 this agreement for any reason without penalty or obligation to 4070 you within 15 days after the date of this agreement by providing 4071 notice to . . .(name of purchaser). . ., submitted in writing 4072 and sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or other 4073 form of mailing that provides proof thereof, at the address or 4074 e-mail address specified in the agreement.â 4075 (3)âA copy of an executed Florida Abandoned Property 4076 Purchase Agreement must be filed with the purchaserâs claim, 4077 along with proof that the purchaser has made payment in full, 4078 and all other required documentation. If proof of payment is not 4079 provided, the department may not approve the claim. 4080 (4)âA purchase agreement under this section which discounts 4081 the value of abandoned property by more than the amount 4082 authorized in paragraph (1)(e) is enforceable only by the 4083 seller. 4084 (5)(a)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term: 4085 1.ââAsset purchaserâ means a business association that has 4086 purchased property from a large business association. 4087 2.ââLarge business associationâ means a business 4088 association or group of business associations which: 4089 a.âGenerates $100 million or more in annual gross receipts 4090 or sales; 4091 b.âEmploys 100 or more full-time employees in the United 4092 States; or 4093 c.âHas equity securities publicly traded on an exchange 4094 regulated by the United States Securities and Exchange 4095 Commission. 4096 (b)âClaims filed by an asset purchaser under this section 4097 must include: 4098 1.âA complete copy of the asset purchase agreement or 4099 similar contract between the asset purchaser and the seller; and 4100 2.âAn attestation by the seller, either in the asset 4101 purchase agreement or in a separate written affirmation from the 4102 owner, that the owner: 4103 a.âIs a large business association as defined in paragraph 4104 (a); and 4105 b.âIs aware that it is selling unclaimed property that may 4106 be recovered from the administrator without paying a fee. 4107 (c)âIf the seller is a publicly traded entity, the asset 4108 purchaser may provide a copy, or a link to an online copy, of 4109 the most recent Form 10K filed with the United States Securities 4110 and Exchange Commission in lieu of the attestation required by 4111 subparagraph (b)2. 4112 (d)âThis subsection does not apply to asset purchase 4113 agreements involving the assets of a business association 4114 arising out of a bankruptcy proceeding under Title 11 of the 4115 United States Code or corporate dissolution or a similar 4116 proceeding under applicable state law, such as receiverships and 4117 assignments for the benefit of creditors. 4118 (e)âThis subsection does not apply to asset purchase 4119 agreements between an asset purchaser and sellers that comprise 4120 a large business association. 4121 (f)âThe requirements of this subsection apply only to 4122 claims filed based on asset purchase agreements executed on or 4123 after the effective date of this act. 4124 (g)âThis subsection does not limit the ability of the 4125 department to request or receive additional evidence sufficient 4126 to establish to the satisfaction of the department that the 4127 claimant is the owner of the property pursuant to this chapter. 4128 (h)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 4129 subsection. The department may change by administrative rule the 4130 annual gross receipts or sales threshold to an amount less than 4131 $100 million as specified in sub-subparagraph (a)2.a. 4132 Section 86.âSection 717.138, Florida Statutes, is amended 4133 to read: 4134 717.138âRulemaking authority.âThe department shall 4135 administer and provide for the enforcement of this chapter. The 4136 department has authority to adopt rules pursuant to ss. 4137 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement the provisions of this 4138 chapter. The department may adopt rules to allow for electronic 4139 filing of fees, forms, and reports required by this chapter. The 4140 authority to adopt rules pursuant to this chapter applies to all 4141 abandoned unclaimed property reported and remitted to the Chief 4142 Financial Officer, including, but not limited to, property 4143 reported and remitted pursuant to ss. 45.032, 732.107, 733.816, 4144 and 744.534. 4145 Section 87.âSection 717.1382, Florida Statutes, is amended 4146 to read: 4147 717.1382âUnited States savings bond; abandoned unclaimed 4148 property; escheatment; procedure.â 4149 (1)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, a United 4150 States savings bond in possession of the department or 4151 registered to a person with a last known address in the state, 4152 including a bond that is lost, stolen, or destroyed, is presumed 4153 abandoned and unclaimed 5 years after the bond reaches maturity 4154 and no longer earns interest and shall be reported and remitted 4155 to the department by the financial institution or other holder 4156 in accordance with ss. 717.117(5) and (11) ss. 717.117(1) and 4157 (5) and 717.119, if the department is not in possession of the 4158 bond. 4159 (2)(a)âAfter a United States savings bond is abandoned and 4160 unclaimed in accordance with subsection (1), the department may 4161 commence a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction in 4162 Leon County for a determination that the bond shall escheat to 4163 the state. Upon determination of escheatment, all property 4164 rights to the bond or proceeds from the bond, including all 4165 rights, powers, and privileges of survivorship of an owner, co 4166 owner, or beneficiary, shall vest solely in the state. 4167 (b)âService of process by publication may be made on a 4168 party in a civil action pursuant to this section. A notice of 4169 action shall state the name of any known owner of the bond, the 4170 nature of the action or proceeding in short and simple terms, 4171 the name of the court in which the action or proceeding is 4172 instituted, and an abbreviated title of the case. 4173 (c)âThe notice of action shall require a person claiming an 4174 interest in the bond to file a written defense with the clerk of 4175 the court and serve a copy of the defense by the date fixed in 4176 the notice. The date must not be less than 28 or more than 60 4177 days after the first publication of the notice. 4178 (d)âThe notice of action shall be published once a week for 4179 4 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation 4180 published in Leon County. Proof of publication shall be placed 4181 in the court file. 4182 (e)1.âIf no person files a claim with the court for the 4183 bond and if the department has substantially complied with the 4184 provisions of this section, the court shall enter a default 4185 judgment that the bond, or proceeds from such bond, has 4186 escheated to the state. 4187 2.âIf a person files a claim for one or more bonds and, 4188 after notice and hearing, the court determines that the claimant 4189 is not entitled to the bonds claimed by such claimant, the court 4190 shall enter a judgment that such bonds, or proceeds from such 4191 bonds, have escheated to the state. 4192 3.âIf a person files a claim for one or more bonds and, 4193 after notice and hearing, the court determines that the claimant 4194 is entitled to the bonds claimed by such claimant, the court 4195 shall enter a judgment in favor of the claimant. 4196 (3)âThe department may redeem a United States savings bond 4197 escheated to the state pursuant to this section or, in the event 4198 that the department is not in possession of the bond, seek to 4199 obtain the proceeds from such bond. Proceeds received by the 4200 department shall be deposited in accordance with s. 717.123. 4201 Section 88.âSection 717.139, Florida Statutes, is amended 4202 to read: 4203 717.139âUniformity of application and construction.â 4204 (1)âThe Legislature finds that laws governing abandoned 4205 property serve a vital public purpose by protecting the property 4206 rights of owners, facilitating the return abandoned property to 4207 its owners, preventing private escheatment, and ensuring that 4208 abandoned assets are preserved and safeguarded from waste or 4209 misuse. It is the public policy of the state to protect the 4210 interests of owners of abandoned unclaimed property. It is 4211 declared to be in the best interests of owners of unclaimed 4212 property that such owners receive the full amount of any 4213 unclaimed property without any fee. 4214 (2)âThis chapter shall be applied and construed as to 4215 effectuate its general purpose of protecting the interest of 4216 missing owners of abandoned property, while providing that the 4217 benefit of all unclaimed and abandoned property shall go to all 4218 the people of the state, and to make uniform the law with 4219 respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it. 4220 It is the intent of the Legislature that property reported under 4221 this chapter remains the property of the owner and that the 4222 State of Florida acts solely as a custodian, not as the owner, 4223 of such property. Title to abandoned property may not transfer 4224 to the state except as expressly provided by law and only after 4225 all reasonable efforts to identify and return the property to 4226 its rightful owner have been exhausted. 4227 Section 89.âSection 717.1400, Florida Statutes, is amended 4228 to read: 4229 717.1400âRegistration.â 4230 (1)âIn order to file claims as a claimant claimantâs 4231 representative, receive a distribution of fees and costs for 4232 approved claims from the department, and obtain information 4233 regarding abandoned unclaimed property dollar amounts and 4234 numbers of reported shares of stock held by the department, an 4235 individual must meet all of the following requirements: 4236 (a)âBe one of the following: 4237 1.âA Florida-licensed private investigator holding a Class 4238 âCâ individual license under chapter 493; 4239 2.âA Florida-certified public accountant; or 4240 3.âA Florida-licensed attorney. 4241 (b)âHave obtained a certificate of registration from Must 4242 register with the department. 4243 (2)âAn application for registration as a claimant 4244 representative must be submitted in writing on a form prescribed 4245 by the department and must be accompanied by all of the 4246 following: 4247 (a)âA legible color copy of the applicantâs current driver 4248 license showing the full name and current address of such 4249 person. If a current driver license is not available, another 4250 form of photo identification must be provided which shows the 4251 full name and current address of such person. 4252 (b)âIf the applicant is a private investigator: 4253 1.âon such form as the department prescribes by rule and 4254 must be verified by the applicant. To register with the 4255 department, a private investigator must provide: 4256 (a)âA legible copy of the applicantâs Class âAâ business 4257 license under chapter 493 or that of the applicantâs firm or 4258 employer which holds a Class âAâ business license under chapter 4259 493; and. 4260 2.(b)âA legible copy of the applicantâs Class âCâ 4261 individual license issued under chapter 493. 4262 (c)âIf the applicant is a certified public accountant, the 4263 applicantâs Florida Board of Accountancy number. 4264 (d)âIf the applicant is a licensed attorney, the 4265 applicantâs Florida Bar number. 4266 (e)(c)âThe business address, and telephone number, tax 4267 identification number, and state of domicile or incorporation of 4268 the applicantâs private investigative firm or employer. 4269 (f)(d)âThe names of agents, or employees, or independent 4270 contractors, if any, who are designated or authorized to act on 4271 behalf of the applicant private investigator, together with a 4272 legible color copy of their photo identification issued by an 4273 agency of the United States, or a state, or a political 4274 subdivision thereof. 4275 (g)âA statement that the applicant has not, during the 5 4276 year period immediately preceding the submission of the 4277 application, violated any part of the Florida Disposition of 4278 Abandoned Personal Property Act. 4279 (h)âA statement that the applicant has not been convicted 4280 of, or plead guilty to, a felony or any offense involving moral 4281 turpitude; dishonesty; deceit; or breach of fiduciary duty, 4282 including theft, attempted theft, falsification, tampering with 4283 records, securing writings by deception, fraud, forgery, or 4284 perjury. 4285 (i)(e)âSufficient information to enable the department to 4286 disburse funds by electronic funds transfer. 4287 (j)âThe applicantâs notarized signature immediately 4288 following an acknowledgment that any false or perjured statement 4289 subjects the applicant to criminal liability under the laws of 4290 this state 4291 (f)âThe tax identification number of the private 4292 investigatorâs firm or employer which holds a Class âAâ business 4293 license under chapter 493. 4294 (2)âIn order to file claims as a claimantâs representative, 4295 receive a distribution of fees and costs from the department, 4296 and obtain unclaimed property dollar amounts and numbers of 4297 reported shares of stock held by the department, a Florida 4298 certified public accountant must register with the department on 4299 such form as the department prescribes by rule and must be 4300 verified by the applicant. To register with the department, a 4301 Florida-certified public accountant must provide: 4302 (a)âThe applicantâs Florida Board of Accountancy number. 4303 (b)âA legible copy of the applicantâs current driver 4304 license showing the full name and current address of such 4305 person. If a current driver license is not available, another 4306 form of identification showing the full name and current address 4307 of such person or persons shall be filed with the department. 4308 (c)âThe business address and telephone number of the 4309 applicantâs public accounting firm or employer. 4310 (d)âThe names of agents or employees, if any, who are 4311 designated to act on behalf of the Florida-certified public 4312 accountant, together with a legible copy of their photo 4313 identification issued by an agency of the United States, or a 4314 state, or a political subdivision thereof. 4315 (e)âSufficient information to enable the department to 4316 disburse funds by electronic funds transfer. 4317 (f)âThe tax identification number of the accountantâs 4318 public accounting firm employer. 4319 (3)âIn order to file claims as a claimantâs representative, 4320 receive a distribution of fees and costs from the department, 4321 and obtain unclaimed property dollar amounts and numbers of 4322 reported shares of stock held by the department, an attorney 4323 licensed to practice in this state must register with the 4324 department on such form as the department prescribes by rule and 4325 must be verified by the applicant. To register with the 4326 department, such attorney must provide: 4327 (a)âThe applicantâs Florida Bar number. 4328 (b)âA legible copy of the applicantâs current driver 4329 license showing the full name and current address of such 4330 person. If a current driver license is not available, another 4331 form of identification showing the full name and current address 4332 of such person or persons shall be filed with the department. 4333 (c)âThe business address and telephone number of the 4334 applicantâs firm or employer. 4335 (d)âThe names of agents or employees, if any, who are 4336 designated to act on behalf of the attorney, together with a 4337 legible copy of their photo identification issued by an agency 4338 of the United States, or a state, or a political subdivision 4339 thereof. 4340 (e)âSufficient information to enable the department to 4341 disburse funds by electronic funds transfer. 4342 (f)âThe tax identification number of the attorneyâs firm or 4343 employer. 4344 (4)âInformation and documents already on file with the 4345 department before the effective date of this provision need not 4346 be resubmitted in order to complete the registration. 4347 (4)(5)âIf a material change in the status of a registration 4348 occurs, the claimant representative a registrant must, within 30 4349 days, provide the department with the updated documentation and 4350 information in writing. Material changes include, but are not 4351 limited to, the following,: a designated agent or employee 4352 ceasing to act on behalf of the designating person, a surrender, 4353 suspension, or revocation of a license, or a license renewal. 4354 (a)âIf a designated agent or employee ceases to act on 4355 behalf of the person who has designated the agent or employee to 4356 act on such personâs behalf, the designating person must, within 4357 30 days, inform the department the Division of Unclaimed 4358 Property in writing of the termination of agency or employment. 4359 (b)âIf a registrant surrenders the registrantâs license or 4360 the license is suspended or revoked, the registrant must, within 4361 30 days, inform the division in writing of the surrender, 4362 suspension, or revocation. 4363 (c)âIf a private investigatorâs Class âCâ individual 4364 license under chapter 493 or a private investigatorâs employerâs 4365 Class âAâ business license under chapter 493 is renewed, the 4366 private investigator must provide a copy of the renewed license 4367 to the department within 30 days after the receipt of the 4368 renewed license by the private investigator or the private 4369 investigatorâs employer. 4370 (5)(6)âAn applicantâs claimant representativeâs A 4371 registrantâs firm or employer may not have a name that might 4372 lead another person to conclude that the claimant 4373 representativeâs registrantâs firm or employer is affiliated or 4374 associated with the United States, or an agency thereof, or a 4375 state or an agency or political subdivision of a state. The 4376 department shall deny an application for registration or revoke 4377 a registration if the applicantâs or claimant representativeâs 4378 registrantâs firm or employer has a name that might lead another 4379 person to conclude that the firm or employer is affiliated or 4380 associated with the United States, or an agency thereof, or a 4381 state or an agency or political subdivision of a state. Names 4382 that might lead another person to conclude that the firm or 4383 employer is affiliated or associated with the United States, or 4384 an agency thereof, or a state or an agency or political 4385 subdivision of a state, include, but are not limited to, the 4386 words United States, Florida, state, bureau, division, 4387 department, or government. 4388 (6)(7)âThe licensing and other requirements of this section 4389 must be maintained as a condition of registration with the 4390 department. 4391 (7)âTo maintain active registration under this section, a 4392 claimant representative must file and obtain payment on at least 4393 10 claims per calendar year following the date of initial 4394 registration. 4395 (a)âIf a claimant representative fails to meet this 4396 requirement, the department must notify the claimant 4397 representative in writing and provide 30 days to demonstrate 4398 compliance or good cause for noncompliance. 4399 (b)âIf the claimant representative does not cure the 4400 deficiency or demonstrate good cause within the time provided, 4401 the department must revoke the registration. 4402 (c)âA claimant representative whose registration is revoked 4403 under this subsection may not reapply for registration under 4404 this section for a period of 1 year following the effective date 4405 of the revocation. 4406 Section 90.âSubsection (1) of section 1001.281, Florida 4407 Statutes, is amended to read: 4408 1001.281âOperating Trust Fund.â 4409 (1)âThe Operating Trust Fund, FLAIR number 48-2-510, is 4410 created within the Department of Education. 4411 Section 91.âSubsection (1) of section 1001.282, Florida 4412 Statutes, is amended to read: 4413 1001.282âAdministrative Trust Fund.â 4414 (1)âThe Administrative Trust Fund, FLAIR number 48-2-021, 4415 is created within the Department of Education. 4416 Section 92.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 4417 197.582, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4418 197.582âDisbursement of proceeds of sale.â 4419 (2)(a)âIf the property is purchased for an amount in excess 4420 of the statutory bid of the certificateholder, the surplus must 4421 be paid over and disbursed by the clerk as set forth in 4422 subsections (3), (5), and (6). If the opening bid included the 4423 homestead assessment pursuant to s. 197.502(6)(c), that amount 4424 must be treated as surplus and distributed in the same manner. 4425 The clerk shall distribute the surplus to the governmental units 4426 for the payment of any lien of record held by a governmental 4427 unit against the property, including any tax certificates not 4428 incorporated in the tax deed application and omitted taxes, if 4429 any. If there remains a balance of undistributed funds, the 4430 balance must be retained by the clerk for the benefit of persons 4431 described in s. 197.522(1)(a), except those persons described in 4432 s. 197.502(4)(h), as their interests may appear. The clerk shall 4433 mail notices to such persons notifying them of the funds held 4434 for their benefit at the addresses provided in s. 197.502(4). 4435 Such notice constitutes compliance with the requirements of s. 4436 717.117 s. 717.117(6). Any service charges and costs of mailing 4437 notices shall be paid out of the excess balance held by the 4438 clerk. Notice must be provided in substantially the following 4439 form: 4440 4441 NOTICE OF SURPLUS FUNDS 4442 FROM TAX DEED SALE 4443 4444 CLERK OF COURT 4445 .... COUNTY, FLORIDA 4446 4447 Tax Deed #........ 4448 Certificate #........ 4449 Property Description: ........ 4450 Pursuant to chapter 197, Florida Statutes, the above 4451 property was sold at public sale on ...(date of sale)..., and a 4452 surplus of $...(amount)... (subject to change) will be held by 4453 this office for 120 days beginning on the date of this notice to 4454 benefit the persons having an interest in this property as 4455 described in section 197.502(4), Florida Statutes, as their 4456 interests may appear (except for those persons described in 4457 section 197.502(4)(h), Florida Statutes). 4458 To the extent possible, these funds will be used to satisfy 4459 in full each claimant with a senior mortgage or lien in the 4460 property before distribution of any funds to any junior mortgage 4461 or lien claimant or to the former property owner. To be 4462 considered for funds when they are distributed, you must file a 4463 notarized statement of claim with this office within 120 days 4464 after of this notice. If you are a lienholder, your claim must 4465 include the particulars of your lien and the amounts currently 4466 due. Any lienholder claim that is not filed within the 120-day 4467 deadline is barred. 4468 A copy of this notice must be attached to your statement of 4469 claim. After the office examines the filed claim statements, it 4470 will notify you if you are entitled to any payment. 4471 Dated: ........ 4472 Clerk of Court 4473 4474 Section 93.âParagraph (t) of subsection (1) of section 4475 626.9541, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4476 626.9541âUnfair methods of competition and unfair or 4477 deceptive acts or practices defined.â 4478 (1)âUNFAIR METHODS OF COMPETITION AND UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE 4479 ACTS.âThe following are defined as unfair methods of competition 4480 and unfair or deceptive acts or practices: 4481 (t)âCertain life insurance relations with funeral directors 4482 prohibited.â 4483 1.âNo life insurer shall permit any funeral director or 4484 direct disposer to act as its representative, adjuster, claim 4485 agent, special claim agent, or agent for such insurer in 4486 soliciting, negotiating, or effecting contracts of life 4487 insurance on any plan or of any nature issued by such insurer or 4488 in collecting premiums for holders of any such contracts except 4489 as prescribed in s. 626.785(2) s. 626.785(3). 4490 2.âNo life insurer shall: 4491 a.âAffix, or permit to be affixed, advertising matter of 4492 any kind or character of any licensed funeral director or direct 4493 disposer to such policies of insurance. 4494 b.âCirculate, or permit to be circulated, any such 4495 advertising matter with such insurance policies. 4496 c.âAttempt in any manner or form to influence policyholders 4497 of the insurer to employ the services of any particular licensed 4498 funeral director or direct disposer. 4499 3.âNo such insurer shall maintain, or permit its agent to 4500 maintain, an office or place of business in the office, 4501 establishment, or place of business of any funeral director or 4502 direct disposer in this state. 4503 Section 94.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 4504 made by this act to section 717.101, Florida Statutes, in a 4505 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (6) of section 4506 772.13, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 4507 772.13âCivil remedy for terrorism or facilitating or 4508 furthering terrorism.â 4509 (6)(a)âIn any postjudgment execution proceedings to enforce 4510 a judgment entered against a terrorist party under this section 4511 or under 18 U.S.C. s. 2333 or a substantially similar law of the 4512 United States or of any state or territory of the United States, 4513 including postjudgment execution proceedings against any agency 4514 or instrumentality of the terrorist party not named in the 4515 judgment pursuant to s. 201(a) of the Terrorism Risk Insurance 4516 Act, 28 U.S.C. s. 1610: 4517 1.âThere is no right to a jury trial under s. 56.18 or s. 4518 77.08; 4519 2.âA defendant or a person may not use the resources of the 4520 courts of this state in furtherance of a defense or an objection 4521 to postjudgment collection proceedings if the defendant or 4522 person purposely leaves the jurisdiction of this state or the 4523 United States, declines to enter or reenter this state or the 4524 United States to submit to its jurisdiction, or otherwise evades 4525 the jurisdiction of the court in which a criminal case is 4526 pending against the defendant or person. This subparagraph 4527 applies to any entity that is owned or controlled by a person to 4528 whom this paragraph applies; 4529 3.âCreditor process issued under chapter 56 or chapter 77 4530 may be served upon any person or entity over whom the court has 4531 personal jurisdiction. Writs of garnishment issued under s. 4532 77.01 and proceedings supplementary under s. 56.29 apply to 4533 intangible assets wherever located, without territorial 4534 limitation, including bank accounts as defined in s. 4535 674.104(1)(a), financial assets as defined in s. 678.1021(1), or 4536 other intangible property as defined in s. 717.101. The situs of 4537 any intangible assets held or maintained by or in the 4538 possession, custody, or control of a person or entity so served 4539 shall be deemed to be in this state for the purposes of a 4540 proceeding under chapter 56 or chapter 77. Service of a writ or 4541 notice to appear under this section shall provide the court with 4542 in rem jurisdiction over any intangible assets regardless of the 4543 location of the assets; 4544 4.âNotwithstanding s. 678.1121, the interest of a debtor in 4545 a financial asset or security entitlement may be reached by a 4546 creditor by legal process upon the securities intermediary with 4547 whom the debtorâs securities account is maintained, or, if that 4548 is a foreign entity, legal process under chapter 56 or chapter 4549 77 may be served upon the United States securities custodian or 4550 intermediary that has reported holding, maintaining, possessing, 4551 or controlling the blocked financial assets or security 4552 entitlements to the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the 4553 United States Department of the Treasury, and such financial 4554 assets or security entitlements shall be subject to execution, 4555 garnishment, and turnover by the United States securities 4556 custodian or intermediary; and 4557 5.âNotwithstanding s. 670.502(4), when an electronic funds 4558 transfer is not completed within 5 banking days and is canceled 4559 pursuant to s. 670.211(4) because a United States intermediary 4560 financial institution has blocked the transaction in compliance 4561 with a United States sanctions program, and a terrorist party or 4562 any agency or instrumentality thereof was either the originator 4563 or the intended beneficiary, then the blocked funds shall be 4564 deemed owned by the terrorist party or its agency or 4565 instrumentality and shall be subject to execution and 4566 garnishment. 4567 Section 95.âThe following rules are ratified for the sole 4568 and exclusive purpose of satisfying any condition on 4569 effectiveness imposed under chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida: 4570 Rules 69C-2.004, 69C-2.005, 69C-2.016, 69C-2.022, 69C-2.026, 4571 69C-2.034, 69C-2.035, 69U-100.097, 69V-560.1000, 69V-560.1012, 4572 69V-560.102, 69V-560.7032, 69V-560.7033, 69V-560.7034, 69V 4573 560.7035, and 69V-560.7036, Florida Administrative Code, 4574 entitled âDefinitions,â âDesignation of a Qualified Public 4575 Depository,â âFinancial Information Reports by a Qualified 4576 Public Depository,â âRequirements of Public Depositors,â 4577 âAdministration of Payment of Losses,â âDisqualification, 4578 Suspension, and Administrative Penalty,â âCustodians of Gold 4579 Coin or Silver Coin,â âGold Coin or Silver Coin Deposits,â 4580 âDisciplinary Guidelines,â âAdoption of Forms,â âApplication or 4581 Appointment Procedures and Requirements,â âRecords to Be 4582 Maintained when Engaged in Transactions Involving Gold and 4583 Silver Coin,â âGold Coin and Silver Coin Disclosures,â 4584 âAccredited Refiner or Wholesaler of Gold Coin or Silver Coin,â 4585 âChain of Custody Related to Gold or Silver Coin,â and âRapid 4586 Response Time by Law Enforcement,â respectively, as filed for 4587 adoption with the Department of State pursuant to the 4588 certification packages dated October 31, 2025, and November 1, 4589 2025. 4590 Section 96.âSection 18 of chapter 2025-100, Laws of 4591 Florida, is repealed. 4592 Section 97.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 4593 replace the phrase âthe effective date of this actâ wherever it 4594 occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law. 4595 Section 98.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.